




Westport Fuel Systems - About Westport Fuel Systems - Management































Management




Nancy S. Gougarty





Nancy S. Gougarty, was appointed Chief Executive Officer in July of 2016 and is a member of the Westport Fuel Systems Board of Directors. Prior to her appointment, she was appointed President and Chief Operating Officer in July of 2013 and she served on the Board from February of 2013 to July of 2013. Ms. Gougarty served as the Vice President for TRW Automotive Corporation operations in the Asia-Pacific region from 2008 to 2012. Joining TRW in 2005, her previous positions included vice president of product planning, business planning and business development, and Vice President of braking, electronics and modules for Asia Pacific. Based at the Asia- Pacific headquarters in Shanghai, China, Ms. Gougarty oversaw the operations of more than 30 plants in the region. She directed the development and implementation of strategic and operational plans and worked to enhance strategic relationships with customers and joint venture partners in the region. Ms. Gougarty's distinguished career began in 1978 when she started with GM's Packard Electric Division, first as an industrial engineer; she later took on various roles in application engineering, finance, operations, and sales and engineering with increasing responsibility. In 1997, she was named Managing Director for GM's joint venture in Shanghai, followed by a series of appointments accountable for strategic growth in Asian countries. After the successful post as the Director for Delphi Packard, Asia Pacific, Ms. Gougarty spent three years leading Delphi's largest account as Global Account Director GM, until becoming the Vice President for Delphi Automotive Systems, Japan and Korea. Ms. Gougarty is a certified Six Sigma Green Belt. She holds an EMBA degree from Case Western Reserve University and a Bachelor of Science degree in Industrial Management from the University of Cincinnati. A community service advocate, Ms. Gougarty serves as Advisor to the President of Marietta College, Ohio and is a member of the board of TriMas Corporation.




Ashoka Achuthan





Ashoka Achuthan was appointed as Chief Financial Officer in June 2014. Mr. Achuthan has been with Westport since November 2013 as Executive Vice President, Finance Operations. In this role, he oversaw all operational finance activities within Westport, including financial management of ongoing business operations as well as investments; financial planning, forecasting and reporting; and developing and tracking key performance metrics. Prior to joining Westport, he was CFO at CODA Holdings Inc. between 2011 and 2013, where he held full responsibility for all financial management aspects of the company including the initial public offering filing, organizational readiness for vehicle launch, supply chain management, and development of the battery based power storage business. His career includes over 20 years with Siemens in Asia, Europe and North America. His last position at Siemens was Executive Vice President and CFO of Siemens VDO Automotive Inc. where he helped drive profitability and grow the business from $1.2 billion to $3.2 billion in revenues between 2000 and 2005. Ashoka has also held roles as CFO at Cooper Power Systems Inc. between 2005 and 2008; CFO at ATC Technologies Corp between 2008 and 2010; and the CFO at Key Plastics LLC in 2010. Ashoka earned a Bachelor of Science degree from the University of Bombay, an MBA from Case Western Reserve University, and is a Chartered Accountant.




Andrea Alghisi





Andrea Alghisi was appointed Chief Operating Officer of Westport Fuel Systems Automotive & Industrial Group in June 2016, after the completion of the merger between Westport Innovations Inc. and Fuel Systems Solutions Inc. Mr. Alghisi joined Fuel Systems in March 2016 as COO, having previously held the position of interim COO in 2015 when he was with AP Services, LLC, an affiliate of AlixPartners, LLP. Mr Alghisi joined Fuel Systems from McKinsey & Co. Previously, he was a Managing Director of AlixPartners, a financial advisory firm specializing in business performance improvement and corporate restructuring initiatives, where he was Core member of the EMEA Automotive & Industrial Goods practice. Mr. Alghisi has more than 20 years of professional experience primarily dedicated to leading turnaround, performance improvement and growth strategy programs in the automotive and industrial goods industry. He has worked for 12 years at AlixPartners, supporting investors and management of industrial companies developing and implementing competitive strategies and turnaround programs. Mr. Alghisi led several transformation and cost reduction programs for large European Automotive OEMs and carried out turnaround activities for several companies in Automotive and Industrial Goods Industries. Prior to joining AlixPartners in 2003, Mr. Alghisi worked for 10 years both as a manager in Fiat Group and as a consultant at The Boston Consulting Group, where he performed major performance improvement and growth strategy programs for the Automotive and Industrial goods practice and the consumer and retail practice. Mr. Alghisi received his degree in mechanical engineering from Politecnico of Torino, Italy. Mr. Alghisi received his Master of Business Administration from SDA Bocconi in Milan, Italy. Mr. Alghisi is an occasional lecturer and contributor to conferences and publications on the subjects of automotive industry and corporate restructuring.




Thomas G. Rippon





Thomas G. Rippon is Chief Technology Officer and Executive Vice President of Engineering as of 2016. Mr. Rippon joined Westport Fuel Systems in September 2013 as Vice President, Mining and Rail. Mr. Rippon's experience includes an extensive tenure at General Motors (GM) in both North America and Asia. Mr. Rippon’s career began in 1972 at GM on the assembly line, and from there he was successively promoted. From 2001 to 2011, Mr. Rippon held a number of executive roles responsible for powertrain activities, including building an engine plant capable of producing 350,000 engines per year. Mr. Rippon's last position at GM was Global Program Manager - Powertrain where he was responsible for overall program management of five different joint ventures located in China, Korea, India and Uzbekistan while overseeing more than $1 billion in capital investment. From January 2012 to August 2013, he held the roles of Vice President Engineering, Vice President, and PMO at CODA Automotive, where he had responsibility for program execution, standardizing process and procedures, and change management. Mr. Rippon is currently a member of the board of directors of Cummins Westport Inc. He was active in his community and has served as a volunteer for organizations such as the American Women's Club, Boy Scouts of America, and YMCA.




Jack Keaton




 


Jack Keaton is Executive Vice President of the Westport Fuel Systems Innovation Group as of June 2016. Mr. Keaton oversees operations including program management, supply chain, product & operational planning, business development, and human resources. Prior to joining Westport Fuel Systems in April 2014, Mr. Keaton was Senior Vice-President of Vehicle Programs & Development at Tata Technologies Ltd. where he played a key role in product development and organizational structure, working with clients in India. Prior to Tata Technologies, Jack worked with General Motors for 27 years in various countries, functions and joint ventures around the globe. His last position with GM was Global Vehicle Line Executive for Mini-cars in Korea. Among his many accomplishments in this role was the development and launch of the current Chevrolet Spark as well as championing the MyLink® Radio/Information system which became the GM global standard for all non-luxury production cars. Mr. Keaton was also a Manufacturing Engineer for a division of Hughes Tools (Now Baker Hughes) after serving as a Captain in the U.S. Army. Jack has a B.S. from the U.S. Military Academy at West Point, N.Y. and an MBA from Harvard University.




James (Jim) Arthurs





Jim Arthurs is Executive Vice President, Electronics at Westport Fuel Systems. Mr. Arthurs joined Westport Fuel Systems in 2011 and has overseen the development of Westport’s heavy duty engine and fuel system technologies, including the High Pressure Direct Injection system. In November 2016, Jim took responsibility for the newly formed Electronics Group, with oversight of Electronic Control Unit hardware and software across Westport Fuel Systems. Jim is also Chairman of Cummins Westport Inc., a joint venture company owned equally by Cummins Inc. and Westport Fuel Systems that designs, engineers and markets spark-ignited natural gas engines for medium- and heavy-duty transportation applications such as trucks and buses. Previously, Jim was President of Cummins Westport Inc. from 2012 to 2013 and led the development of the Cummins Westport ISX12 G natural gas engine. Prior to that, Jim was Vice President, Cryogenic Systems and Vice President, Operations for Westport. Prior to joining Westport, Jim was a Managing Partner and Co-Founder of i3 Transition Partners LLP, a management consulting firm that specializes in business assessments and helping companies plan for and implement strategic change. Over his career, Jim has held senior sales, operating and executive management positions at several companies including IBM and Weyerhaeuser. Jim was CIO at the Loewen Group and Managing Director of Operations for the Jim Pattison Group. He is currently a member of the board of directors of Western Forest Products Inc., an integrated forest products company. Jim holds a BSc degree in Computer Science from the University of Calgary.













News Releases



July 28
Westport Fuel Systems Announces Underwriters' Exercise of Over-Allotment Option
Westport Fuel Systems Inc. announced today the exercise of the underwriters' option from its previously announced offering to purchase an additional 2,425,000 common shares at the Offering price of US$1.50 per share. With the exercise of the option, Westport issued a total of 19,125,000 common shares under the offering for gross proceeds of US$28,687,500. 


July 19
Westport Fuel Systems Closes Offering of Common Shares
Westport Fuel Systems Inc. announced today the closing of its previously announced offering of 16,700,000 common shares at a price of US$1.50 per share, for gross proceeds of US$25,050,000.  


July 14
Westport Fuel Systems Prices Offering of Common Shares
Westport Fuel Systems will offer 16,700,000 common shares at a price of US$1.50 per share, for gross proceeds of US$25,050,000. 


July 13
Westport Fuel Systems Provides Q2 2017 Revenue Guidance and Pro Forma Cash Summary
Westport Fuel Systems Inc. announced today that it expects Q2 2017 revenues to be $57-$59 million for the quarter ended June 30, 2017 and a cash balance of approximately $87 million at June 30, 2017. 


July 13
Westport Fuel Systems Proposes Offering of Common Shares
Westport Fuel Systems Inc. announced today that it intends to offer and sell common shares in an underwritten public offering. 




Twitter




  
				    
				1750 West 75th Ave Suite 101
				Vancouver, BC
				Canada, V6P 6G2
 +1-604-718-2000













Westport Fuel Systems' (WPRT) CEO Nancy Gougarty on Q1 2017 Results - Earnings Call Transcript | Seeking AlphaSign in / Join NowGO»Westport Fuel Systems' (WPRT) CEO Nancy Gougarty on Q1 2017 Results - Earnings Call TranscriptMay.11.17 | About: Westport Fuel (WPRT) Westport Fuel Systems, Inc. (NASDAQ:WPRT)
Q1 2017 Earnings Conference Call
May 11, 2017, 05:00 PM ET
Executives
Caroline Sawamoto - Manager, IR and Communications
Nancy Gougarty - CEO
Ashoka Achuthan - CFO
Andrea Alghisi - COO
Analysts
Rob Brown - Lake Street Capital Markets
Eric Stine - Craig-Hallum Capital Group
Jeff Osborne - Cowen and Company
Operator
Thank you and good afternoon. Welcome to the Westport Fuel Systems First Quarter Conference Call, which is being held to coincide with the press release containing Westport Fuel Systems' financial results that went out earlier this afternoon.
On today's call, speaking on behalf of Westport Fuel Systems is Chief Executive Officer, Nancy Gougarty; Chief Operating Officer of the Automotive and Industrial Segment, Andrea Alghisi as well as our Chief Financial Officer, Ashoka Achuthan. Attendance at this call is open to the public and to media, but questions will be restricted to the investment community.
You're reminded that certain statements made in this conference call and our responses to various questions may constitute forward-looking statements within the meaning of U.S. and applicable Canadian securities law and such forward-looking statements are made based on our current expectations and involve certain risks and uncertainties. Actual results may differ materially from those projected in the forward-looking statements, so you are cautioned not to place undue reliance on these statements. Information contained in this conference call is subject to and qualified in its entirety by information contained in the company’s public filings.
I would now turn the call over to Nancy Gougarty. Please go-ahead ma'am.
Nancy Gougarty
Thank you very much. Good afternoon and thank you for joining us to discuss Westport Fuel Systems' first quarter results.
Today we're speaking for our third full quarter as a combined company. The past 12 months have not been without their challenges, but today, I am more confident than ever that the company is on the right path to becoming a sustainable, profitable company that can deliver value to customers, employees and shareholders.
When I first spoke to you last August, we laid our several clear goals. Firstly, focus on our product portfolio and sell non-core assets. Secondly, align our cost and revenue and capture the benefits and synergies of the merger. Thirdly, improve our balance sheet and fourthly, the advancement in bringing HPDI 2.0 to market.
I am pleased to be able to report that we have made substantial progress on the path to meet these goals and while we continue to focus on achieving these goals, we remain agile and ready to ensure that we are able to adapt to ever-changing business environment.
We have made the decision to exit our industrial business, the first step of which was the sale of our APU assets. The decision was a result of a comprehensive review of our entire portfolio that began last summer. The industrial segment is a good business that is it adjusted EBITDA positive. 
However, when we looked at our core skills, the competitive dynamics of the end markets, the size of competitors, this knowledge, plus our thorough assessment made our decision clear for Westport Fuel Systems to exit this segment.
Though it is taking time, we are purposeful and deliberate to ensure that Westport Fuel Systems gets the maximum shareholder value for these industrial assets. The cash received through the APU asset sale is meaningful and improves our balance sheet. It also allows us to concentrate on growing market share for our unmatched proprietary alternative fuel technology as well as bring new products to market that can drive results for the long term.
It is our knowledge, technical expertise, deep portfolio, OEM relationship that make Westport Fuel System, the global leader in our markets.

Turning to Slide 4 as you know I have more than 30 years' experience working in the truck and automotive industry, but you can see in this slide, we have assembled an executive team that brings similar knowledge to what it takes to be a Tier 1 supplier to a global OEM and we're working together to deliver operational excellence for our entire global organization.
On Slide 5, I would like to spend some more time talking about the new Westport Fuel System and what we consider is our core portfolio as our highest value statement. This focus comes from our portfolio reviews.
Our global automotive segment is delivering improved operational performance with higher adjusted EBITDA contribution. The Cummins Westport joint venture, which showcases our technology and how to partner with the leading OEM is also paying us quarterly dividends.
And thirdly, our corporate and technology segment including HPDI and other technologies, in this segment, 2017 is a milestone year as we'll be shipping our first HPDI 2.0 commercial components later this year. This will provide our first commercial revenue and allow us to dramatically reduce our R&D cost. This is a key step in turning this segment into a profitable contributor to our bottom line.
Moving to Slide 6, the automotive segment, the automotive segment provides a range of products for propane, natural gas and even hydrogen. This is a global business with Europe representing about 65% of the sales, followed by the Americas and Asia at approximately 10% each and the U.S. representing approximately 7% of the automotive revenue.
As a global business, each region has its own characteristics, fuel price differential, government policy and fueling infrastructures. We understand the specific market characteristics in order to best serve them.
Since the merger closed, we have taken several initiatives to improve our competitiveness in the market. These actions include consolidating our operating footprint, reducing our operating costs and restructuring our global purchasing and inventory system.
The results have been an improvement in adjusted EBITDA with a business that is more in line with its current revenue and positioned to benefit when the market fully recovers.
On to Slide 7, our Cummins joint venture, Westport joint venture delivers consistent dividends even with challenges of oil prices. We are also excited with the initial response of our zero-equipment emissions engine and the joint venture continue to provide a stream of earnings, plus potentials for years to come. Ashoka will talk more about CWI in his section.
And turning to our corporate and technology segment, this segment is where we have developed new technologies for the transportation industry, including HPDI 2.0 as seen on Slide 8. This is the most immediate and exciting technology that we have right now and later this year, we'll be shipping our first commercial component to our launch partner.
This is a combination of many years of dedicated and determined work to bring HPDI 2.0 to market. I am proud to say that the team has worked through challenging that have come with bringing new technology to market. We have taken the setbacks and lessons learned in build off of them in order to provide better product.
We have met the rigorous standards that our OEM partners and customers demand and are excited to provide a game-changing technology that will allow users to reduce their fuel cost, while making a meaningful reduction in their greenhouse gas emissions.
Our OEM partners plan to launch the technology in the European market where the heavy-duty truck shipment typically ranges between 225,000 to 275,000 units per year and the taxes, cheap diesel prices elevated and greenhouse gas reductions are valued more than another market.

I can't overstate the importance of this milestone for the company, bringing new revenue streams in for component sales and licensing revenue and also allowing us to reduce significantly our R&D spending. This first program was unique and we needed to make a substantial investment to develop and bring to market this first of kind technology.
As we work with other OEMs however, our work book continues to be funded by these partners and commercial opportunities known. For example, we just recently executed a development agreement and beginning work with a leading OEM to develop their engine using technology to meet their country's new emission rule similar to Euro 6.
Our OEM customer came to for our industry knowledge, our engine development technical expertise, proven components and engine management system plus our track record. We have clear scope of what needs to be accomplished and we are funded for the entire project and there is a clear path for a supply agreement. This is the way that the new Westport Fuel Systems will be working.
Before I turn the call over to Andrea and Ashoka, I want to reiterate that we are excited and energized as we lead the shift in the global transportation system from petroleum to clean gaseous fuels of all forms.
We do this by commercializing our unique technologies, bringing to market no compromised products that offer compelling emissions and greenhouse gas reductions. We have the fundamentals in place and Westport Fuel Systems is moving in the right direction.
With that Andrea, over to you.
Andrea Alghisi
Thank you, Nancy.
Now starting on Slide 10, as you've seen in our financial statements, all of our industrial segment is now recorded in discontinued operations. So, my comments will be about our global automotive segment. Please note that our global automotive segment now includes the electronic business as well as the high-pressure components, which had previously been included in industrial.
All numbers shown have been adjusted to reflect their addition. My comments will compare the first quarter of 2017 to the fourth quarter of 2016. Because the merger did not occur until June 2016, the results of the first quarter of 2016 are less meaningful for comparative purposes.
As Nancy stated, since the close of the merger we have undertaken a number of initiatives to improve our operating performance and reduce our costs. This is included for our stats like consolidating our operating footprint and eliminating redundancies, but also exploiting technical levers like product redesign and make versus buy and commercial levers like strategic sourcing and supplier negotiation to improve product competitiveness.
We have additional efforts underway and we have implemented a program of operational excellence. My colleagues and I have learned over years in the industry, you cannot control market cycles, government policies or commodity prices. You can only control how you operate and deliver to your clients.
Now turning to the performance in the first quarter, revenues were down from the fourth quarter due to weaker sales in the compressor business and in the high-pressure business as well. However, leaseback performance to recover in the second quarter.
Gross margin of 25% were arrived from prior quarters as a result of the efforts to better control our product cost. I am pleased to report that our adjusted EBITDA for the automotive segment was $3.6 million or 6.4%, a significant improvement from prior quarters and a reflection of the efforts and actions taken since the merger closed.
As we look out at the rest of the year, we currently see stable markets and expect automotive segment revenues of between $200 million and $230 million. Looking at 2017, there are some outstanding tenders that could provide some tailwinds, while there are some market that might weaken and there is a potential for some of our new programs to push into early 2018 if the OEM delay them, so those could be some advantage.

Please note that there is some seasonality in this business as well and all the squeal we expect higher revenues in the first half versus the second half and typically the September quarter is the weakest due to summer holidays and production changeovers.
When we look at our automotive segment, we expect and target these as a pattern between 7% and 10% adjusted EBITDA margin business, with volumes, product mix, product cost and topic efficiency as the key drivers of the range. We have initiatives underway to improve our adjusted EBITDA margin and we are targeting to be well within that range in 2018 and beyond.
I'll now turn the call over to you Ashoka.
Ashoka Achuthan
Thank you, Andrea. My comments begin on Slide 12, as of March 31, we had cash and cash equivalents of $47.7 million down from $60.9 million at the year-end. This does not include the cash we received as a part of the sale of our APU assets, which as you know closed on the 20 April.
While the gross proceeds of that transactions were $70 million, our net proceeds were approximately $60 million after transaction fees, deal costs and a holdback of $7 million with the release milestones over the next 24 months.
After the deal closed, we made an $8 million prepayment of royalties payable to address our collateral obligation to [Caucasian] Capital. With respect to the sale of the second non-core asset, I can say that we are in active negotiations with the potential buyer. Please note that the industrial businesses are now reflected as discontinued operations in our financials.
The first fourth quarter revenues for these businesses were $17.5 million and had they not been reported as discontinued operations, our first quarter revenue would have been $77.5 million. We are also ahead of our initial scheduled for capturing synergies from the merger and now expect to exceed the original $30 million run rate savings target by the end of 2017.
At the bottom of the slide, you'll see our consolidated adjusted EBITDA for the current and the past four quarters, which shows a loss of $4.1 million in the first quarter of 2017. We're seeing a positive trend; however, I do want to point out that the first quarter was helped by an HPDI program, progress payment and also the timing of certain expenses.
We do not expect the second quarter to be strong -- as strong as the first, as we do not have a similar progress payment and we have some higher development costs. Basically the 2017 quarterly adjusted EBITDA is going to fluctuate as we work through the final stages of the commercial launch of HPDI 2.0, but what is important is that we're moving fast towards profitability and expect to be adjusted EBITDA positive in early 2018.
Now turning on to Slide 13 which shows our CWI joint venture. Revenues and shipments were up from the first quarter of 2016 on improved performance in the U.S. offset by continued weakness in certain international markets.
Gross margins were 30.8%, up from the first quarter of 2016 primarily due to lower warranty costs, which are now at more normalized levels. R&D expenses of $10.8 million are higher due to engine development costs. CWI has evaluated R&D and sales and marketing costs over the past two years as the company launched its near 6.7-liter engine, spent R&D dollars to incorporate onboard diagnostics and develop the new zero equivalent emission engines.
We are almost through this higher spent however, and by the second half we'll be trending back towards spending levels seen in prior years. CWI's new 2018 product line is a very significant milestone in product development for the company. These new engines mean our customers can choose the most affordable pack to zero equivalent emissions with no commercial constraints of supply or technology readiness.

I know some of you on the call attended the ACT show in Long Beach last week and you may have firsthand the owner operator feedback. We think these engines are game changing and are excited about the prospects for the joint venture in the coming years.
Turning to Slide 14 which shows our SG&A R&D expenses from continuing operations by segment. Our SG&A costs are trending down; however, the first quarter 2017 was impacted by increased advisory fees and transaction related costs.
Rightsizing our cost structure remains a key priority. As an example, we had another round of headcount reductions in March and we will continue to take appropriate steps needed to align our costs with our revenues.
R&D spending was $12.2 million down from prior quarters in part due to timing, but a majority was the result of actions taken to focus our R&D efforts. As in prior quarters, corporate and technology segment accounted for the largest component of R&D, mostly related to our HPDI 2.0 program.
For the next three quarters of 2017, we expect to see similar levels of R&D spending through launch after which the spending will drop off considerably. We expect 2018 R&D spend for our corporate and technology segments to be at about half the levels of 2017.
Of course, new programs could add to this, but as Nancy made very clear, any new R&D programs in our corporate and technology segment will be funded by third parties.
Turning to Slide 15, which shows our quarterly cash walk starting with 60.9 million at December 31, 2016 we received $3.8 million in dividends from joint venture spent $1.7 million in net credit paydowns, spent $2.6 million on restructuring payments had an increase of $4.1 million working capital.
Capital expenditures were down was $2.2 million down slightly from recent quarters due to timing. We expect to spend an additional $17.5 million in capital expenditures in the rest of this year of which about $14 million will be spent in the second quarter. This spend is needed to successfully launch HPDI 2.0 to meet our launch timing and to be able to service our current launch partner and future HPDI programs for other OEMs.
It's an investment in our future, but it is not regarding amount. Much like R&D, it is limited to 2017. We expect to spend only $5 million on capital expenditures in all of 2018, most of which is related to maintenance spend for our global automotive business.
Our cash used in operations was approximately $6.4 million. We closed the quarter at $47.7 million which as I mentioned earlier does not include the cash we received from the recent asset sale.
Moving on to Slide 16, as Andrea said, we expect our automotive revenues to be between $200 million and $230 million for 2017. Revenues from the industrial segment including any related to the transition agreement will be recorded as discontinued operations.
With the sale of our industrial segment, we do lose some adjusted EBITDA contribution. However, I want to reiterate what I said on our last call, that our goal of reaching adjusted EBITDA breakeven and then on to full profitability remains our most pressing target and we expect to be adjusted EBITDA positive on a consolidated basis in early 2018.
Finally, we will compete our actions to address our balance sheet. We're off to a very good start in 2017. In March, we refinanced the €10 million European credit facility for five years at similar terms. In April, we received a net of €60 million from the sale of our APU business.
We do have approximately 40 million of debentures coming due in September, but we've been approaching this from multiple angles and the cash received from the recent asset sales only expands our options.
We are in discussions with the existing holders about rolling over or extending all or some of the debentures. We're also far along at other options including refinancing them through additional asset sales, cash from potential licensing agreements, a new loan or credit facility or capital market transactions and it is possible that the solution will be a combination of all of these elements.

What is important to note however is that we're looking for a finite amount that is not an open-ended need for more cash while we develop new technologies. We have two strong businesses that are sources of cash flow and value and we had HPDI technology that we believe will start producing significant value for Westport Fuel Systems in the coming years.
We have and we will take -- continue to take the necessary steps to put the company on a sustainable path. The options I listed will be a bridge to 2018 when we will be adjusted EBITDA positive with growing HPDI 2.0 revenues and our legacy restructuring spend behind us.
With that, I'll turn the call over to the operator for questions.
Question-and-Answer Session
Operator
We'll now begin the question-and-answer session. [Operator instructions] The first question comes from Rob Brown with Lake Street Capital Markets. Please go ahead.
Rob Brown
Good afternoon.
Andrea Alghisi
Good afternoon.
Rob Brown
Just wondering if you -- on HPDI program, you're talking about shipping later this year, could you maybe just give us some parameters about how that kind of ramps into 2018? Is it initial product this year and then production product next year? Can you give us some idea of how that HPDI program ramps?
Andrea Alghisi
Nancy, would you like to take that?
Nancy Gougarty
Yes, I will -- I've got some -- Rob, first of all thanks for your question and as you know we're really quite excited about what's going on with HPDI, but the way it rolls out in calendar year '17 we are building some early protection units and then rolling into what we call regular production.
But our OEM partner will be I think shortly here making some announcements related to the actual marketing plans. So, we're preparing our suppliers and preparing and getting the supply system ready in part 10-Q in order for us to meet these initial builds that will happen in the latter part of calendar year '17.
Rob Brown
Okay. Good. Thank you. That's helpful and then on the other HPDI programs you're working on, could you give us a sense of how many are active at the moment and maybe give us a some sense on when they on the timeline is for product much is there?
Nancy Gougarty
Well a couple things to be said. I think that as we're working in terms of HPDI, what we're finding is that the transportation and the tracking piece is one of it, but we're also finding some very interesting dynamic from off vehicle application as well as in rail. So, I would be -- I think a bit remiss to give you the total numbers that we're working with several people in these various areas.
I would tell you that the good news is that because we've done all the heavy lifting relative to the validation and reliability testing for all the HPDI components the good news is it's now getting the products to market because its application work in these circumstances.
We're able to get the product to market in a much quicker fashion than what we did with our original launch, which meant that we had to do all the component validation and then do the vehicle validation activity in addition to that.
So, I think that what you will see is over the next years several opportunities that can rollout. Now it really again as you know, we're the Tier 1, so this is really up to the OEMs relative to how they want to put this product in their portfolio, but I would say in general we're highly encouraged relative to HPDI being a technology that is key for their alternate fuel technology, primarily because it has such good performance relative to the diesel product.
Rob Brown
Okay. And then just one more quick question on the R&D spending, I think you mentioned that corporate spending will come down by about half once that HPI program rolls down, what's kind of the baseline there of spending that you're running at.

Ashoka Achuthan
Yeah let me take that Rob. we've obviously not released figures or guided to figures for R&D spend, but you can expect our ongoing spend to be somewhere you can tracking to about half the levels that you're seeing in the corporate and technology segment today.
Rob Brown
Okay. Good. Thank you. I'll turn it over.
Operator
The next question comes from Eric Stine with Craig-Hallum. Please go ahead.
Eric Stine
Hi everyone. Listen Nancy you just answered a part of this question, but related to that new OEM agreement that you just disclosed today, and given that it's at 2.0 in that platform and it speeds the timeframe, are you able to kind of give some thought about when you think that could move from development to supply agreement may be too early, but just wondering if you could provide any color there?
Nancy Gougarty
First of all, Eric, thanks for the question, let me try to answer this and I think there are some other folks in the room that probably can chime in, but part of the development agreement we have to find in there that actually moves us into a supply agreement arrangement.
And I would anticipate that that's going to happen within calendar year '17 that the supply agreement activity will get going. Again, what we wanted -- I think it's important that we are a full system and full solution provider meaning that we really what in addition to being able to do the development work, we want to supply agreements to go along with it.
So, as I stated, so the new Westport, both getting customer funding, but also making sure that we're able to bring meaningful revenues through is really been key to us. So, we have now structured our agreements in phases in order for us to be allowed and to ensure that the supply agreement is going to come along with the development activity.
Ashoka Achuthan
The only thing I would add to that is, this is Ashoka, the only thing I would add to that is this is not an HPDI program that we were reporting to.
Eric Stine
Okay. Understood. Okay. Good. That is helpful and then maybe just turning to HPDI given that you are approaching volumes, initial volumes with your lead customer, just curious is that -- have you noticed any other OEMs that are moving faster as a result is a C Volvo about to come to market?
Nancy Gougarty
I would tell you that each OEM has their own view relative to this and we had lots of discussion with them about it fits into their portfolio. I would say more highly encouraged in the European market that because of some greenhouse gas and CO2 initiatives that we're going to see it more in the near-term but, again as we always continue to say Eric and will continue, this is the OEM that meets their launch timing relative to this.
I would say as I mentioned in my comment to Rob that we are really very pleased because of the fact that we get such comparable performance in terms of range as well as for vehicle performance to diesel that this provides -- this alternate technology has lots of advantages over other things that OEMs can initiate. So that is one of the things at least on the trucking side that we're finding to be one of the calling card that's making it really interesting.
Eric Stine
Right. Okay. So maybe last one for me and I did jump on late, so I apologize, if you touched on this but the industrial piece and discontinuing that, should we take this as a that there are certainly more to come or at least that would be your objective.
Nancy Gougarty
So, Eric in the showcase portion, he did mention that we're in the last, we're in negotiations with party to sell another portion of our industrial asset.
Eric Stine
Right. Okay. So, you had previously talked about to you solely PUC you have the other one, I was just curious, do you see within industrial others beyond that or is the one non-core asset sales that you're in final stages, does that incorporate the rest of the industrial the discontinued operations?

Nancy Gougarty
Right now, the only thing that's in discontinued operation is those that are part of the industrial group, but I would tell you that we continue to look at our portfolio and there are some other opportunities and again in certain cases we're looking for some market opportunity for them and as they become ready for us to move out into the market, we will certainly let you know that.
Eric Stine
Okay. Thank you.
Operator
[Operator instructions] The next question comes from Jeff Osborne with Cowen and Company, please go ahead.
Jeff Osborne
Hey good afternoon, couple questions on my end, I was wondering if you could talk about the CWI near zero engine any sense of preliminary interest or backlog is open that part a of the question and then for Ashoka, how should we be thinking about in 2018 gross margins for CWI as that engine ramps up, is there a larger warranty reserve and then we should be factoring that into our assumptions.
Ashoka Achuthan
Thanks for your question Jeff. Let me take the first one first, which is interest in the zero equivalent engines that CWS just launched. As you know, the 8.9-liter product is available today and the 12-liter version of the zero-equivalent engine with the launch later this year or very early next year.
Very positive reaction, I don't know if you were there at the ACT in Long Beach last week, but we were extremely impressed with customer reaction people see it as a game changer and most importantly it offers them a real alternative to zero equivalent -- as a zero-equivalent option with no commercial constraints to supply all technological readiness compared to the other zero option -- zero emission options that may be available.
So very positive and we expect that to contribute very favorably to both the topline on the bottom line going forward.
Your second question on the gross margins year we expect to see continuing strength on gross margins as these engines come on stream, but more significantly, we expect our operating margins to improve because of that used to ongoing R&D spend.
As you know, the past year and this year have been significantly impacted by the spend related to the development of these engines both the new 6.7-liter engine as well as the zero equivalent versions of the 8.9 and the 12 liters and plus a fair amount of engineering spend related to ongoing -- onboard diagnostics, which are required for engines in 2018.
Once that will be behind us, which we expect will happen in the middle of this year, you can see a significant drop off for both R&D and SG&A spend going forward as well.
Jeff Osborne
Got it. That's helpful, maybe one for Andrea or anyone can jump but is there a sense on the automotive side that you could give the rough mix that you expect or you saw in 2016 on a combined basis for the two companies, what the mix is of delayed OEM and retrofit kits for the vehicles?
Andrea Alghisi
Thank you, Jeff for your questions and I heard correctly the Ike asking for 2016 or 2017?
Jeff Osborne
Maybe just I am just curious what the rough mix is maybe in the quarter for 2017 would be helpful. I don't need exact numbers, but just a perspective of what you anticipate between those three segments.
Andrea Alghisi
Well I would say that the 50% of our business is after market and let's say the other 50% is share among let's say 3D businesses, so one is OEM, the second is delayed OEM and the third one is what we call diversified businesses. So, the OEM is another together with the delayed OM is another let's say 25%, 30% and the last 20% is diversified businesses.
Some of them are complementary because they are for example we have what we call a service business which allows us to give more revenue stream to our dealers in Italy.
Jeff Osborne
Got it and Ashoka any sense of perspective of the remaining assets that you had sell in terms of size, is that half the size or similar to what you've already done with the ATE segment, my assumption is it's much smaller but I just wanted to if you had any comments on that.

Ashoka Achuthan
Not unreasonable as I mentioned Jeff, bear in mind we have reclassified almost the entire piece of the industrial segment as discontinued operations. So, you can draw your own conclusions from that in terms of what is left after the APU sales. There is a very small piece of the form industrial business the rolls into automotive and that has to do with electronics.
But as Nancy mentioned besides these, we have a couple of businesses that are potentially non-core as well.
Jeff Osborne
Makes sense, the last one quick I saw the automotive service revenue as the highest it's been I think in three years, what was going on there? The MD&A is at $3.7 million.
Ashoka Achuthan
So that was a milestone payment from our customer, related to the HPDI program.
Jeff Osborne
Got it. Okay. Thank you.
Operator
This concludes the question-and-answer session. I would now like to turn the conference back over to the management for any closing remarks.
Andrea Alghisi
Thanks for joining the call today everyone. If you have any follow-up questions, please feel free to reach out to the Investor Relations team. Thanks again for your interest in Westport Fuel Systems. That ends our Q1 call today.
Operator
Thank you to everyone for joining us today. If you have any follow-up questions, please feel free to reach out to the Westport Fuel Systems Investor Relations team. Thanks again for your interest in Westport Fuel Systems.
Copyright policy: All transcripts on this site are the copyright of Seeking Alpha. However, we view them as an important resource for bloggers and journalists, and are excited to contribute to the democratization of financial information on the Internet. (Until now investors have had to pay thousands of dollars in subscription fees for transcripts.) So our reproduction policy is as follows: You may quote up to 400 words of any transcript on the condition that you attribute the transcript to Seeking Alpha and either link to the original transcript or to www.SeekingAlpha.com. All other use is prohibited.
THE INFORMATION CONTAINED HERE IS A TEXTUAL REPRESENTATION OF THE APPLICABLE COMPANY'S CONFERENCE CALL, CONFERENCE PRESENTATION OR OTHER AUDIO PRESENTATION, AND WHILE EFFORTS ARE MADE TO PROVIDE AN ACCURATE TRANSCRIPTION, THERE MAY BE MATERIAL ERRORS, OMISSIONS, OR INACCURACIES IN THE REPORTING OF THE SUBSTANCE OF THE AUDIO PRESENTATIONS. IN NO WAY DOES SEEKING ALPHA ASSUME ANY RESPONSIBILITY FOR ANY INVESTMENT OR OTHER DECISIONS MADE BASED UPON THE INFORMATION PROVIDED ON THIS WEB SITE OR IN ANY TRANSCRIPT. USERS ARE ADVISED TO REVIEW THE APPLICABLE COMPANY'S AUDIO PRESENTATION ITSELF AND THE APPLICABLE COMPANY'S SEC FILINGS BEFORE MAKING ANY INVESTMENT OR OTHER DECISIONS.
If you have any additional questions about our online transcripts, please contact us at: transcripts@seekingalpha.com. Thank you!
About this article:ExpandTagged: Industrial Goods, Pollution & Treatment Controls, Canada, TranscriptsError in this transcript? Let us know.Contact us to add your company to our coverage or use transcripts in your business.Learn more about Seeking Alpha transcripts here.Follow SA Transcripts and get email alertsSearch TranscriptThis transcriptFindAll transcriptsFindCompare To:All WPRT TranscriptsOther Companies in this sector










Westport Appoints Nancy Gougarty as President & COO - Fleet News Daily  : Fleet News Daily

















































HOME
PRODUCTS

Engines & Drivetrains
Breaks, Suspensions & Chassis
Cab, Trailer & Body New
Vehicles
Fleet Diagnostics & Software
Accessories
Videos


FLEET MAINTENANCE
PEOPLE
CONNECTED FLEET NEWS
SAFETY
SHOWCASE

Vehicle Lifts
Pressure Washing


TRANSIT NEWS
ADVERTISE
SUBSCRIBE





















Wheels & Tires
Tools
Equipment
Fuel & Oil
Shop Stuff
Driver Stuff
Training
Management
Green
Featured Videos
Fleet Tracking
Contact






















Westport Appoints Nancy Gougarty as President & COO


fleetnewsdaily | 
	

		July 27, 2013	









Westport Innovations (TSX:WPT / NASDAQ:WPRT), focused on engineering advanced natural gas engines and vehicles, has announced that Nancy Gougarty has been appointed President and Chief Operating Officer of Westport after resigning her position on the company’s Board of Directors.
The change in roles for Nancy is part of Westport’s progression from research and development into an organization focussed on the global commercialization of a wide range of products.
Nancy S. Gougarty
“Nancy brings valuable direction and experience in product delivery execution from her roles in the global automotive sector,” said David Demers, CEO of Westport. “Nancy will play a key role in implementing our strategic priorities, supporting Westport in meeting the challenges of operating a global business and driving Westport’s financial success with her experience in operations and international product sales.”
Nancy has extensive business experience in the global automotive industry. Originally appointed to the Westport Board of Directors in February 2013, she served as the vice president for TRW Automotive Corporation for Asia-Pacific, with responsibility for profit and loss, from January 2008 to 2012.  TRW sales for Asia-Pacific were reported at $2.3 billion in 2011.  Her previous positions included vice president of product planning, business planning and business development.
She has held high-profile leadership positions in the automotive sector, including Managing Director for General Motors’ joint venture in Shanghai, Director for Delphi Packard Asia Pacific, Global Account Director General Motors, and vice president for Delphi Automotive Systems, Japan and Korea.









Category: General Update, People



Subscribe
If you enjoyed this article, subscribe to receive more just like it.









Comments are closed.




		« DHL App to Track Ocean and Freight Shipments 

Cooper Tire and Industrias Negromex Commercialize Silica Masterbatch Technology »	






 









 







 



 Recent News 

LA Metro Expands Electric Bus Orders


Truck Accessories Provider Rugged Liner Taps BigRoad for ELD Compliance Solution


Georgia School Bus Fleets Increasingly Turn to Propane


Fleets Expand Use of Solar to Charge Batteries in Trucks and Trailers


Wisconsin Employees Agree to Have Microchips Implanted: For Real


New Hendrickson Front and Rear Suspension Bushing Adapter Kits


Enterprise Truck Rental Expands in Maryland


New EPA-Approved Refrigerant for North America Truck and Trailer Systems


 



CategoriesCategories
Select Category
Accessories
Breaks, Suspensions & Chassis
Cab, Trailer & Body
Cab, Trailer & Body New
Conference Calendar
Connected Fleet News
Driver Stuff
Engines & Drivetrains
Equipment
Featured
Featured Videos
Fleet Diagnostics & Software
Fleet Maintenance
Fleet Tracking
Fleet Tracking
For Sale
Fuel & Oil
General Update
Green
Management
MATS
News
People
Pressure Washing
Products
Safety
Shop Stuff
Tech Talk
Tools
Training
Transit News
Vehicle Lifts
Vehicles
Videos
Wheels & Tires


Archives Archives

Select Month
 July 2017 
 June 2017 
 May 2017 
 April 2017 
 March 2017 
 February 2017 
 January 2017 
 December 2016 
 November 2016 
 October 2016 
 September 2016 
 August 2016 
 July 2016 
 June 2016 
 May 2016 
 April 2016 
 March 2016 
 February 2016 
 January 2016 
 December 2015 
 November 2015 
 October 2015 
 September 2015 
 August 2015 
 July 2015 
 June 2015 
 May 2015 
 April 2015 
 March 2015 
 February 2015 
 January 2015 
 December 2014 
 November 2014 
 October 2014 
 September 2014 
 August 2014 
 July 2014 
 June 2014 
 May 2014 
 April 2014 
 March 2014 
 February 2014 
 January 2014 
 December 2013 
 November 2013 
 October 2013 
 September 2013 
 August 2013 
 July 2013 
 June 2013 
 May 2013 
 April 2013 
 March 2013 
 February 2013 
 January 2013 
 December 2012 
 November 2012 
 October 2012 

 

Connect





 


 
 






		©  2017 Fleet News Daily. All rights reserved. Premium WordPress Themes.

	



 



Manufacturing and Industrial Stocks | Seeking AlphaSign in / Join NowGO»Manufacturing and Industrial StocksLAFARGEHOLCIM LTD ADR 2017 Q2 - Results - Earnings Call SlidesHCMLY• Today, 8:03 PM • SA TranscriptsL'Air Liquide SA 2017 Q2 - Results - Earnings Call SlidesAIQUF• Today, 6:53 PM • SA TranscriptsLinde AG 2017 Q2 - Results - Earnings Call SlidesLNAGF• Today, 6:48 PM • SA TranscriptsArcadis NV 2017 Q2 - Results - Earnings Call SlidesARCVF• Today, 5:35 PM • SA TranscriptsFlowserve Corporation 2017 Q2 - Results - Earnings Call SlidesFLS• Today, 5:04 PM • SA TranscriptsLydian International (LYDIF) Presents At Sprott Conference - SlideshowLYDIF• Today, 2:04 PM • SA TranscriptsDreamliner Performance SatisfiesBA• Today, 1:15 PM • Dhierin Bechai•5 CommentsKlabin S.A. ADR 2017 Q2 - Results - Earnings Call SlidesKLBAY• Today, 11:31 AM • SA TranscriptsUS Ecology, Inc. 2017 Q2 - Results - Earnings Call SlidesECOL• Today, 11:12 AM • SA TranscriptsRockwell Collins, Inc. 2017 Q3 - Results - Earnings Call SlidesCOL• Today, 9:48 AM • SA TranscriptsColfax Corporation 2017 Q2 - Results - Earnings Call SlidesCFX• Today, 9:48 AM • SA TranscriptsAV Homes, Inc 2017 Q2 - Results - Earnings Call SlidesAVHI• Today, 8:51 AM • SA TranscriptsBarnes Group Inc 2017 Q2 - Results - Earnings Call SlidesB• Today, 8:50 AM • SA TranscriptsBombardier Inc.B 2017 Q2 - Results - Earnings Call SlidesBDRBF• Today, 7:39 AM • SA TranscriptsHitachi Ltd. ADR 2017 Q1 - Results - Earnings Call SlidesHTHIY• Today, 4:28 AM • SA TranscriptsMTU Aero Engines AG 2017 Q2 - Results - Earnings Call SlidesMTUAF• Today, 4:03 AM • SA TranscriptsGeneral Dynamics: Another Solid Quarter, Overvaluation PersistsGD• Today, 3:30 AM • Sure Dividend•5 CommentsCaterpillar: OK, What Now?CAT• Yesterday, 3:32 PM • Vince Martin•7 CommentsCaterpillar Breaks Out On Massive Full-Year Guidance UpgradeCAT• Yesterday, 2:54 PM • Michael FitzsimmonsWest Fraser Timber Co. (WFTBF) Acquires Gilman - M&A SlideshowWFTBF• Yesterday, 2:53 PM • SA TranscriptsEMCOR Group, Inc. 2017 Q2 - Results - Earnings Call SlidesEME• Yesterday, 2:49 PM • SA TranscriptsUndervalued And Growing: Argan, Inc.AGX• Yesterday, 1:52 PM • Ty Huggins•5 CommentsAdomani: Electric Buses Are The Way To GoADOM• Yesterday, 12:41 PM • Marcus Mincey•2 CommentsMilacron Holdings 2017 Q2 - Results - Earnings Call SlidesMCRN• Yesterday, 12:18 PM • SA TranscriptsBoeing: Sagging Yield Is A Warning SignBA• Yesterday, 11:54 AM • Stone Fox Capital•28 CommentsTriMas Corporation 2017 Q2 - Results - Earnings Call SlidesTRS• Yesterday, 11:03 AM • SA TranscriptsL-3 Communications Holdings Inc. 2017 Q2 - Results - Earnings Call SlidesLLL• Yesterday, 10:07 AM • SA TranscriptsAGCO Corporation 2017 Q2 - Results - Earnings Call SlidesAGCO• Yesterday, 9:50 AM • SA TranscriptsCurtiss-Wright Corporation 2017 Q2 - Results - Earnings Call SlidesCW• Yesterday, 8:31 AM • SA TranscriptsBoeing: StunningBA• Yesterday, 7:30 AM • Dhierin Bechai•35 CommentsStanley Black & Decker: 140 Consecutive Years Of Dividend Payments And Powerful BrandsSWK• Yesterday, 7:27 AM • Simply Safe Dividends•3 CommentsHoneywell: The Story Continues To Get BetterHON• Yesterday, 6:36 AM • WG Investment Research•4 CommentsTime To Get Off The Caterpillar TractorCAT• Yesterday, 5:17 AM • Reason Investments•7 CommentsDynacor Gold: Signs Of A Turnaround?DNGDF• Yesterday, 4:25 AM • Gold Mining Bull•4 Comments3M: Still A Great Company After Q2 Earnings ReleaseMMM• Yesterday, 4:05 AM • Ploutos Investing•4 CommentsPlug Power Surprisingly Increases Expensive Credit Facility With NY Green BankPLUG• Yesterday, 12:24 AM • Henrik Alex•29 CommentsTower International, Inc. 2017 Q2 - Results - Earnings Call SlidesTOWR• Yesterday, 12:03 AM • SA TranscriptsMcDermott International Is Still A BargainMDR• Wed, Jul. 26, 5:28 PM • Orthodox Investor•7 CommentsIDEX Corporation 2017 Q2 - Results - Earnings Call SlidesIEX• Wed, Jul. 26, 4:59 PM • SA TranscriptsD. R. Horton Inc. 2017 Q3 - Results - Earnings Call SlidesDHI• Wed, Jul. 26, 4:59 PM • SA TranscriptsThe Boeing Company 2017 Q2 - Results - Earnings Call SlidesBA• Wed, Jul. 26, 2:51 PM • SA Transcripts•3 CommentsBoeing Is Hitting New All-Time HighsBA• Wed, Jul. 26, 12:45 PM • Jonathan Weber•11 CommentsBoeing: This Amazes MeBA• Wed, Jul. 26, 10:45 AM • Quad 7 Capital•25 CommentsUnited States Steel Corporation 2017 Q2 - Results - Earnings Call SlidesX• Wed, Jul. 26, 9:20 AM • SA Transcripts•1 CommentUSG Corporation 2017 Q2 - Results - Earnings Call SlidesUSG• Wed, Jul. 26, 9:19 AM • SA TranscriptsTimken Co. 2017 Q2 - Results - Earnings Call SlidesTKR• Wed, Jul. 26, 9:19 AM • SA TranscriptsRockwell Automation, Inc. 2017 Q3 - Results - Earnings Call SlidesROK• Wed, Jul. 26, 9:17 AM • SA TranscriptsIngersoll-Rand plc 2017 Q2 - Results - Earnings Call SlidesIR• Wed, Jul. 26, 9:16 AM • SA TranscriptsFLIR Systems, Inc. 2017 Q2 - Results - Earnings Call SlidesFLIR• Wed, Jul. 26, 9:14 AM • SA Transcripts3M: Buy The Dip For Growth And IncomeMMM• Wed, Jul. 26, 8:50 AM • Stefan Redlich•11 CommentsJoint French-German Fighter Jet Initiative May Affect Lockheed's F-35 Sales ProspectsLMT• Wed, Jul. 26, 8:49 AM • Zoltan Ban•47 CommentsGEA Group AG 2017 Q2 - Results - Earnings Call SlidesGEAGF• Wed, Jul. 26, 8:02 AM • SA TranscriptsGKN Plc 2017 Q2 - Results - Earnings Call SlidesGKNCF• Wed, Jul. 26, 7:31 AM • SA TranscriptsIran And Its Love For Western AircraftBA, EADSF• Wed, Jul. 26, 7:30 AM • Dhierin Bechai•5 CommentsI Was Wrong About CaterpillarCAT• Wed, Jul. 26, 6:58 AM • Josh Arnold•13 CommentsLonza Group AG ADR 2017 Q2 - Results - Earnings Call SlidesLZAGY• Wed, Jul. 26, 2:27 AM • SA TranscriptsHoneywell Is Off To The Races AgainHON• Tue, Jul. 25, 4:13 PM • Josh Arnold•1 CommentIllinois Tool Works Finding It Harder To Clear A Rising BarITW• Tue, Jul. 25, 2:47 PM • Stephen Simpson, CFA•2 CommentsWestport Fuel Systems: Consensus EBIT Estimates Miss The MarkWPRT• Tue, Jul. 25, 2:22 PM • Eric R. I. Crawford•50 CommentsCrane Co. 2017 Q2 - Results - Earnings Call SlidesCR• Tue, Jul. 25, 1:04 PM • SA TranscriptsSnap-on: The Market Rightfully Discounts Current MarginsSNA• Tue, Jul. 25, 12:35 PM • The Value Investor•1 CommentAllegheny Technologies Incorporated 2017 Q2 - Results - Earnings Call SlidesATI• Tue, Jul. 25, 11:40 AM • SA TranscriptsLincoln Electric Holdings, Inc. 2017 Q2 - Results - Earnings Call SlidesLECO• Tue, Jul. 25, 10:28 AM • SA TranscriptsMcDermott International, Inc. 2017 Q2 - Results - Earnings Call SlidesMDR• Tue, Jul. 25, 9:35 AM • SA TranscriptsPentair Inc. 2017 Q2 - Results - Earnings Call SlidesPNR• Tue, Jul. 25, 9:16 AM • SA TranscriptsPulteGroup, Inc. 2017 Q2 - Results - Earnings Call SlidesPHM• Tue, Jul. 25, 9:15 AM • SA TranscriptsAltra Industrial Motion Corp. 2017 Q2 - Results - Earnings Call SlidesAIMC• Tue, Jul. 25, 9:15 AM • SA Transcripts3M Company 2017 Q2 - Results - Earnings Call SlidesMMM• Tue, Jul. 25, 9:15 AM • SA Transcripts•13 CommentsCaterpillar Inc. 2017 Q2 - Results - Earnings Call SlidesCAT• Tue, Jul. 25, 9:13 AM • SA Transcripts•1 CommentOutokumpu OYJ 2017 Q2 - Results - Earnings Call SlidesOUTKF• Tue, Jul. 25, 8:02 AM • SA TranscriptsBoeing 787 Needs Aggressive Cost CuttingBA• Tue, Jul. 25, 7:00 AM • Dhierin Bechai•21 CommentsUPM-Kymmene Corp. 2017 Q2 - Results - Earnings Call SlidesUPMKF• Tue, Jul. 25, 6:24 AM • SA TranscriptsAkzo Nobel N.V. 2017 Q2 - Results - Earnings Call SlidesAKZOF• Tue, Jul. 25, 4:57 AM • SA TranscriptsStanley Black & Decker: Yet Another Classic Beat And Raise QuarterSWK• Tue, Jul. 25, 2:10 AM • Greg Wajda•3 CommentsALR's Stock Of The Week: Interface Inc.TILE• Mon, Jul. 24, 3:10 PM • Paul Price•4 Comments123456...220Next Page





Earnings Call Transcripts | Seeking AlphaSign in / Join NowGO» 








Earnings Transcripts


  Sectors 


All
Most Popular

Basic Materials
Conglomerates
Consumer Goods
Financial
Healthcare
Industrial Goods
Services
Technology
Utilities










Aspen Insurance Holdings' (AHL) CEO Chris O'Kane on Q2 2017 Results - Earnings Call Transcript


AHL•
      Fri, Jul. 28,  8:21 PM

        •
SA Transcripts




MBT Financial's (MBTF) CEO Doug Chaffin on Q2 2017 Results - Earnings Call Transcript


MBTF•
      Fri, Jul. 28,  8:20 PM

        •
SA Transcripts




Sonic Automotive (SAH) Q2 2017 Results - Earnings Call Transcript


SAH•
      Fri, Jul. 28,  8:16 PM

        •
SA Transcripts




Essex Property Trust's (ESS) CEO Michael Schall on Q2 2017 Results - Earnings Call Transcript


ESS•
      Fri, Jul. 28,  8:14 PM

        •
SA Transcripts




CalAtlantic Group's (CAA) CEO Larry Nicholson on Q2 2017 Results - Earnings Call Transcript


CAA•
      Fri, Jul. 28,  8:14 PM

        •
SA Transcripts




Carter's (CRI) CEO Michael Casey on Q2 2017 Results - Earnings Call Transcript


CRI•
      Fri, Jul. 28,  8:11 PM

        •
SA Transcripts




NTT DoCoMo's (DCM) CEO Kazuhiro Yoshizawa on Q1 2017 Results - Earnings Call Transcript


DCM•
      Fri, Jul. 28,  8:10 PM

        •
SA Transcripts




DSP Group's (DSPG) CEO Ofer Elyakim on Q2 2017 Results - Earnings Call Transcript


DSPG•
      Fri, Jul. 28,  8:08 PM

        •
SA Transcripts




Acacia Research's (ACTG) Management on Q2 2017 Results - Earnings Call Transcript


ACTG•
      Fri, Jul. 28,  8:08 PM

        •
SA Transcripts




Universal Logistics Holdings' (ULH) CEO Jeff Rogers on Q2 2017 Results - Earnings Call Transcript


ULH•
      Fri, Jul. 28,  8:04 PM

        •
SA Transcripts




Flowserve Corporation's (FLS) CEO Scott Rowe on Q2 2017 Results - Earnings Call Transcript


FLS•
      Fri, Jul. 28,  8:02 PM

        •
SA Transcripts




LAFARGEHOLCIM's (HCMLY) Management on Q2 2017 Results - Earnings Call Transcript


HCMLY•
      Fri, Jul. 28,  7:57 PM

        •
SA Transcripts




Taubman Centers' (TCO) CEO Robert Taubman on Q2 2017 Results - Earnings Call Transcript


TCO•
      Fri, Jul. 28,  7:50 PM

        •
SA Transcripts




TransCanada (TRP) Q2 2017 Results - Earnings Call Transcript


TRP•
      Fri, Jul. 28,  7:35 PM

        •
SA Transcripts




Essilor International's (ESLOF) on Q2 2017 Results - Earnings Call Transcript


ESLOF•
      Fri, Jul. 28,  7:13 PM

        •
SA Transcripts




Hartford Financial Services Group's (HIG) CEO Christopher Swift on Q2 2017 Results - Earnings Call Transcript


HIG•
      Fri, Jul. 28,  7:11 PM

        •
SA Transcripts




L'Air Liquide's (AIQUF) CEO Benoit Potier on Q2 2017 Results - Earnings Call Transcript


AIQUF•
      Fri, Jul. 28,  6:48 PM

        •
SA Transcripts




Advanced Semiconductor Engineering (ASX) Q2 2017 Results - Earnings Call Transcript


ASX•
      Fri, Jul. 28,  6:44 PM

        •
SA Transcripts




Linde AG (LNAGF) Management on Q2 2017 Results - Earnings Call Transcript


LNAGF•
      Fri, Jul. 28,  6:44 PM

        •
SA Transcripts




AbbVie (ABBV) Q2 2017 Results - Earnings Call Transcript


ABBV•
      Fri, Jul. 28,  6:37 PM

        •
SA Transcripts




Thomas Cook Group's (TCKGF) CEO Peter Fankhauser on Q3 2017 Results - Earnings Call Transcript


TCKGF•
      Fri, Jul. 28,  6:25 PM

        •
SA Transcripts




Unum's (UNM) CEO Rick McKenney on Q2 2017 Results - Earnings Call Transcript


UNM•
      Fri, Jul. 28,  6:20 PM

        •
SA Transcripts




Lithia Motors (LAD) Q2 2017 Results - Earnings Call Transcript


LAD•
      Fri, Jul. 28,  6:16 PM

        •
SA Transcripts




Washington Real Estate Investment Trust's (WRE) CEO Paul McDermott on Q2 2017 Results - Earnings Call Transcript


WRE•
      Fri, Jul. 28,  6:10 PM

        •
SA Transcripts




Wayside Technology Group's (WSTG) CEO Simon Nynens on Q2 2017 Results - Earnings Call Transcript


WSTG•
      Fri, Jul. 28,  6:04 PM

        •
SA Transcripts




WSFS Financial Corporation's (WSFS) CEO Mark Turner on Q2 2017 Results - Earnings Call Transcript


WSFS•
      Fri, Jul. 28,  6:01 PM

        •
SA Transcripts




QIAGEN's (QGEN) CEO Peer Schatz on Q2 2017 Results - Earnings Call Transcript


QGEN•
      Fri, Jul. 28,  5:54 PM

        •
SA Transcripts




National Oilwell Varco (NOV) Q2 2017 Results - Earnings Call Transcript


NOV•
      Fri, Jul. 28,  5:49 PM

        •
SA Transcripts




Public Service Enterprise Group (PEG) Q2 2017 Results - Earnings Call Transcript


PEG•
      Fri, Jul. 28,  5:47 PM

        •
SA Transcripts




Plantronics' (PLT) CEO Joseph Burton on Q1 2018 Results - Earnings Call Transcript


PLT•
      Fri, Jul. 28,  5:43 PM

        •
SA Transcripts





123456...4456Next Page





Search Transcripts






You can use: AND,NOT, OR,* *(exact phrase)













 





Westport Fuel Systems - 2016 - Westport Fuel Systems Announces New CEO; Nancy Gougarty to lead global alternative fuel company



























Westport Fuel Systems Announces New CEO
 Nancy Gougarty to lead global alternative fuel company
published: July 22, 2016
VANCOUVER, BC — The Westport Fuel Systems Inc. ("Westport") (TSX:WPT / Nasdaq:WPRT) Board of Directors is delighted to announce the appointment of Nancy S. Gougarty as Chief Executive Officer ("CEO") effective immediately. David R. Demers, Westport's current CEO, is retiring from the company but will be available to the leadership team in an advisory role through a transition period.
Ms. Gougarty has a long and distinguished career spanning nearly three decades in the transportation-equipment industry that includes senior automotive executive roles with several large automakers and auto-parts companies. She has served as President and Chief Operating Officer of Westport since July of 2013. Before this appointment, Ms. Gougarty was on the Board of Westport from February of 2013 to July of 2013.

"Nancy has proven her ability to work through complex development projects with major global original equipment manufacturers ("OEMs") with a clear sense of what drives profits," said Dr. Warren J. Baker, Chairman of the Westport Board. "Her most recent collaborative efforts leading the integration teams following the merger with Fuel Systems Solutions, Inc. highlighted her skill in managing diverse groups across Europe, Asia & North America while stewarding key relationships with suppliers and joint venture partners. She is clearly the right person to lead our newly combined global company going forward."
"Nancy has the full support of the Board to fulfill her vision for the newly combined company and we are confident in her ability to unite our organization and lead it forward," stated Mariano Costamagna, Board Director and former CEO of Fuel Systems Solutions, Inc.
"I have had the privilege to witness the vision and leadership of both David and Nancy," stated Peter Yu, Board Director. "Through his tireless service, David has built a world-class business that is uniquely positioned in an important industry. Nancy is supremely skilled and perfectly positioned to lead Westport at a critical and transformative moment in our history. Today's changes mark an important milestone in value-creation for all Westport stakeholders."
"Westport Fuel Systems is at an important point in its evolution and I am excited to take the helm of the global leader in alternative fuel systems," said Ms. Gougarty. "We've earned a reputation for innovation and excellence, and have a tremendous set of industry recognized automotive and industrial brands along with dedicated, passionate employees that I'm honoured to work with. The recently completed merger provides a natural point for us to take stock of our strategy and portfolio as we increase our focus on the operating lines that will drive long-term profitability. Over the coming weeks and months, I look forward to engaging with all of our stakeholders as we shape and implement a strategy that will unlock Westport's full potential and increase the value we provide for our customers and for our shareholders."

In addition to her role as CEO, Ms. Gougarty will join the Westport Board of Directors as Mr. Demers steps down from the Board. Mr. Demers has been CEO and a member of the Board since the company was formed in March of 1995.

"I'm both proud and honoured to have been associated with the great people who have been responsible for building Westport into the global organization that it is today," said Mr. Demers. "Nancy has the leadership and management capabilities needed to guide Westport forward through its next stage of growth. I believe that under her direction the company is in good hands."
"On behalf of the Westport Board, I'd like to recognize and thank David for his enormous contributions and visionary leadership over the past 20 years," added Dr. Baker. "As the founding CEO of Westport, his entrepreneurial spirit and unmatched passion have been instrumental in making Westport a technology leader in natural gas transportation. He helped build Westport from the initial research work conducted at the University of British Columbia into a company with global reach, and he fostered an innovative culture that believes in changing the world. Pursuing his vision for the company, Westport developed strong relationships with a number of key global transportation OEMs that have a desire to reduce the environmental footprint of their vehicles. In response, the company demonstrated a consistent track record of bringing new cost-effective clean technology to the marketplace."

About Nancy Gougarty
Prior to joining Westport, Ms. Gougarty served as the Vice President for TRW Automotive Corporation operations in the Asia-Pacific region from 2008 to 2012. Joining TRW in 2005, her previous positions included vice president of product planning, business planning and business development, and Vice President of steering, braking, electronics and occupant safety systems for Asia Pacific. Based at the Asia-Pacific headquarters in Shanghai, China, Ms. Gougarty oversaw the operations of more than 30 plants in the region. She directed the development and implementation of strategic and operational plans and worked to enhance strategic relationships with customers and joint venture partners in the region. Ms. Gougarty's career began in 1978 when she started with GM's Packard Electric Division, first as an industrial engineer; she later took on various roles in application engineering, finance, operations, and sales and engineering with increasing responsibility. In 1997, she was appointed Managing Director for GM's joint venture in Shanghai, followed by a series of appointments including accountability for strategic growth in Asian countries. After a successful posting as the Director for Delphi Packard, Asia Pacific, Ms. Gougarty spent three years leading Delphi's largest account as Global Account Director GM, until becoming the Vice President for Delphi Automotive Systems, Japan and Korea. Ms. Gougarty holds an EMBA degree from Case Western Reserve University and a Bachelor of Science degree in Industrial Management from the University of Cincinnati.
Second Quarter 2016 Financial Results
Westport Fuel Systems expects to report on its second quarter financial results on Tuesday August 9th, 2016 and will hold a conference call that day to discuss recent events. Details for the call will be provided in advance of the second quarter release.


About Westport Fuel Systems
At Westport Fuel Systems, we are driving innovation to power a cleaner tomorrow. We are inventors, engineers, manufacturers and suppliers of advanced clean-burning fuel systems and components that can change the way the world moves. Our technology delivers performance, fuel efficiency and environmental benefits to address the challenges of global climate change and urban air quality. Headquartered in Vancouver, Canada, we serve our customers in more than 70 countries with leading global transportation brands. At Westport Fuel Systems, we think ahead. For more information, visit www.wfsinc.com.



More Information


Westport Fuel Systems(Investor Inquiries)
Caroline Sawamoto
Manager, Investor Relations
T 604-718-2046
invest@wfsinc.com
www.wfsinc.com




News

2017 
2016 
2015 
2014 
2013 
2012 
2011 
2010 
2009 
2008 
Search 

Subscribe
Tags
board memberscorporatemanagement
Share










News Releases



July 28
Westport Fuel Systems Announces Underwriters' Exercise of Over-Allotment Option
Westport Fuel Systems Inc. announced today the exercise of the underwriters' option from its previously announced offering to purchase an additional 2,425,000 common shares at the Offering price of US$1.50 per share. With the exercise of the option, Westport issued a total of 19,125,000 common shares under the offering for gross proceeds of US$28,687,500. 


July 19
Westport Fuel Systems Closes Offering of Common Shares
Westport Fuel Systems Inc. announced today the closing of its previously announced offering of 16,700,000 common shares at a price of US$1.50 per share, for gross proceeds of US$25,050,000.  


July 14
Westport Fuel Systems Prices Offering of Common Shares
Westport Fuel Systems will offer 16,700,000 common shares at a price of US$1.50 per share, for gross proceeds of US$25,050,000. 


July 13
Westport Fuel Systems Provides Q2 2017 Revenue Guidance and Pro Forma Cash Summary
Westport Fuel Systems Inc. announced today that it expects Q2 2017 revenues to be $57-$59 million for the quarter ended June 30, 2017 and a cash balance of approximately $87 million at June 30, 2017. 


July 13
Westport Fuel Systems Proposes Offering of Common Shares
Westport Fuel Systems Inc. announced today that it intends to offer and sell common shares in an underwritten public offering. 




Twitter




  
				    
				1750 West 75th Ave Suite 101
				Vancouver, BC
				Canada, V6P 6G2
 +1-604-718-2000























Nancy S. Gougarty - Executive Bio, Compensation History, and Contacts - Equilar Atlas










 

















Log in | Sign up








x

 






As Featured In



















Nancy S. Gougarty
Board Member at TriMas Corporation


View Full Profile
Are you Nancy S. Gougarty? Claim your profile


 


Sign up for Equilar Atlas and view Nancy S. Gougarty's full profile. 
With Equilar Atlas, you can:



IDENTIFY corporate executives in Nancy S. Gougarty's  network and community.
												FOLLOW changes in Nancy S. Gougarty's employment and money-in-motion.
												CONNECT with Nancy S. Gougarty through your network of contacts.
												








Nancy S. Gougarty's Executive Work History


Current


Board Member, 
TriMas Corporation


Past
To view Nancy S. Gougarty's complete executive work history, sign up now
Age
61

 
 


Nancy S. Gougarty's Biography



In July 2016, Ms. Gougarty became chief executive officer and a director of Westport Fuel Systems, Inc., a producer of natural gas engines and fuel system components for on and off-highway commercial vehicles, as well as passenger automobiles. From July 2013 to July 2016, Ms. Gougarty was president and chief operating officer of Westport Innovations, a global leader in alternative fuel, low-emissions transportation technologies. Ms. Gougarty served as the vice president for TRW Automotive Corporation, a worldwide automotive supplier, operations in the Asia-Pacific region from 2008 to 2012. Joining TRW in 2005, her previous positions included  ...
(Read More)

			In July 2016, Ms. Gougarty became chief executive officer and a director of Westport Fuel Systems, Inc., a producer of natural gas engines and fuel system components for on and off-highway commercial vehicles, as well as passenger automobiles. From July 2013 to July 2016, Ms. Gougarty was president and chief operating officer of Westport Innovations, a global leader in alternative fuel, low-emissions transportation technologies. Ms. Gougarty served as the vice president for TRW Automotive Corporation, a worldwide automotive supplier, operations in the Asia-Pacific region from 2008 to 2012. Joining TRW in 2005, her previous positions included vice president of product planning, business planning, and business development, and vice president of braking, electronics, and modules for Asia Pacific. Ms. Gougarty has held additional leadership positions in the automotive sector, including managing director for General Motors' joint venture in Shanghai, director for Delphi Packard, Asia Pacific, global account director for General Motors, and vice president for Delphi Automotive Systems, Japan and Korea.

Other Boards and Appointments
Ms. Gougarty joined the Westport Innovations board of directors in February 2013 and resigned in July 2013 upon her appointment as Westport Innovations' president and chief operating officer. Ms. Gougarty is currently a director of AB SKF, a leading global technology provider.
Director Qualifications
Ms. Gougarty has extensive operational leadership experience and expertise directing the development and implementation of strategic and operational plans and international operations.
		
Source: TriMas Corporation on 04/05/2017
		
	

 






Sign up for Equilar Atlas and view Nancy S. Gougarty's full profile. 



												By accessing Equilar Atlas, you can view bios, network, salary and wealth events
												of industry-leading executives like Nancy S. Gougarty. More specifically, you'll be able to:
												

IDENTIFY corporate executives in Nancy S. Gougarty's  network and community.
												FOLLOW changes in Nancy S. Gougarty's employment and money-in-motion.
												CONNECT with Nancy S. Gougarty through your network of conections.
												




View Full Profile


 








Search for over 360,000 executive profiles.





/bio



													Example: Nancy S. Gougarty


















Nancy S. Gougarty's Connections (54)





Sign up now to view Nancy S. Gougarty's 54 connections »









Joshua A. Sherbin
Senior Vice President, General Counsel, Chief Compliance Officer, and Corporate Secretary, TriMas Corporation









Brenda J. Eprile
Former Board Member, Home Capital Group Inc.









Warren J. Baker
Former Board Member, Westport Innovations Inc.









Philip B. Hodge
Former President and Chief Executive Officer, PINE CLIFF ENERGY LTD.









F. Joseph Loughrey
Chairman of the Board, Hillenbrand, Inc.









Gottfried Muench
Former Board Member, Westport Innovations Inc.









Dezso J. Horvath
Former Board Member, Westport Innovations Inc.









David R. Demers
Board Member, Primero Mining Corp.









Joseph P. Caron
Former Board Member, Manulife Financial Corporation









Douglas R. King
Board Member, SJW Group








Popular Profiles






														Sign up now to view more executive profiles »
														









Thomas J. Lynch
Executive Chairman, TE Connectivity Ltd.









John J. Kita
EVP and CFO, A. O. Smith









Carl G. Annessa
EVP and COO, Hornbeck Offshore Services, Inc.









Elon R. Musk
CEO and Chairman, Tesla









Michael C. Montgomery
Board Member, NMI Holdings, Inc.












×

Claim Your Profile Coming Soon
Interested in updating your biography and work history?
We're working on making it happen.
We'll email you when this feature is available.
Please enter valid email address.

Done


Thank you for your interest.
Ok






			Browse executive profiles:
			
				 A
			
				 B
			
				 C
			
				 D
			
				 E
			
				 F
			
				 G
			
				 H
			
				 I
			
				 J
			
				 K
			
				 L
			
				 M
			
				 N
			
				 O
			
				 P
			
				 Q
			
				 R
			
				 S
			
				 T
			
				 U
			
				 V
			
				 W
			
				 X
			
				 Y
			
				 Z



Equilar Homepage
Equilar Atlas
Equilar Insight
Equilar BoardEdge
Equilar Engage
Research Services
Knowledge Network
About Us
Login

ï¿½ 2017 Equilar All Rights Reserved. Privacy Policy
1100 Marshall Street, Redwood City, CA 94063 | Phone (650) 241-6600 | Fax (650) 701-0993















Hall of Fame - Nancy Gougarty





































 













 Home  / About  /News/Events/Athletics/Alumni/Giving/Contact/Apply/Virtual Tour

/







 Admissions 






Freshmen
Transfer
Graduate
International
Contact Admissions 





Schedule a Tour
Admissions Events
Student Stories Video
Virtual Tour





Apply Now
Tuition and Fees
Financial Aid



 




  ACADEMICS 




Colleges

Architecture + Design
Arts + Sciences
Engineering
Management



Programs

All Programs
Program Flowcharts
Professional Development
Online Only  



Catalogs + Courses

Accreditation

Course Descriptions 
                           
Course Schedule 
                           
Undergraduate Catalog
Graduate Catalog



Academic Services

Academic Calendar
Financial Aid
Library
Registrar’s Office
Provost’s Office






 CAMPUS LIFE 






Athletics
Greek Life
Housing
Dean of Students




Campus Safety
Student Events Calendar
International Programs
Student Engagement
Student Government




Career Services
Student Organizations
Study Abroad
Leadership
Campus Map






 COMMUNITY 






Marburger STEM Center
Forensic Science for Educators
Extreme Science Saturdays




Summer Camps
Corporate Partners
Facility Rental
Robofest 




Career Services
Professional Development
Job Postings
Alumni & Friends






 CURRENT STUDENTS 





Academic Achievement Center
Athletics
Campus Safety
Disability Services
Greek Life
Student Government
Transit
Academic Calendar




Bookstore
Career Services
eHelp / Help Desk
International Students
Student Organizations
Campus Map
Clinical Counseling




Financial Aid
Registrar
Student Events Calendar
Academic Honor Code
Advising
Student Code of Conduct
Student Accounts
Student Engagement




  Banner Web
 Black Board
 Webmail
 Flow Charts
 Library






 FACULTY + STAFF 





Academic Calendar
eHelp/Help Desk
President’s Office
Bookstore
eLearning Services




Faculty + Staff Directory
Staff Senate
Provost's Office




Human Resources
Strategic Plan
Campus Map
Campus Safety
Job Postings




  Banner Web
 Black Board
 Webmail
 Flow Charts
 Library












  










  Back

COM Hall of Fame Nancy Gougarty
		
 






As president and chief operating officer of Westport, a natural gas engine and vehicle engineering company based in Vancouver, British Columbia, Nancy Gougarty facilitated the donation of five Ford trucks to Lawrence Technological University. One, a bi-fuel Ford F-250 that runs on either gasoline or compressed natural gas, is used for student research in Lawrence Tech’s alternative fuels program. Westport also provided the University another F-250, two F-150s and an F-450, which are used for campus maintenance.
Gougarty began her career with General Motors, working as an industrial engineer in the Packard Electric Division, and moving into roles of increasing responsibility in application engineering, finance, operations, and sales. In 1997 she was named managing director for GM's joint venture in Shanghai, followed by a series of appointments accountable for strategic growth in Asia. After the successful post as the director for Delphi Packard, Asia Pacific, Gougarty led Delphi's largest account as a global account director, until becoming the vice president for Delphi Automotive Systems in Japan and Korea.
After GM Gougarty joined TRW Automotive Corporation, where she held a number of positions, ending with vice president for operations in the Asia-Pacific region. Based in Shanghai, Gougarty oversaw the operations of more than 30 plants in the region.













      







 21000 West Ten Mile Road
Southfield, MI, 48075-1058 
            1 800 CALL LTU 1-800-225-5588 
            (1 800 225 5588)
            
Home
Contact Us
Site Map





Admissions
Academics
Campus Life




Community
Current Students
Faculty + Staff




News
Events
Athletics




Alumni
Giving
Apply







 © 2017 Lawrence Technological University 





 





×
Request Info


Get Personalized Information Based on your Interests
 Lawrence Technological University has created a personalized, easy-access web site for prospective students. 
 You can start by setting up your own VIP interest page. Based on your unique interests and needs, we will communicate directly with you about events and other important information you might like to know. 
 To create your VIP interest page, choose the level of admissions you are seeking: 

Undergraduate 
Graduate 


 Contact us today. 
      248.204.3160 
      800.225.5588 
admissions@ltu.edu 
We look forward to hearing from you!







×
ASK LTU Need some help?


Ask us anything!













×
Heading

 








× close
Heading

 
 Read More





























Westport Appoints Nancy Gougarty as President & COO | COO Forum









































 
Search





















Westport Appoints Nancy Gougarty as President & COO

Posted on July 27, 2013  by  glowtouch 


Experience and Leadership in the Automotive Sector Provides Key Direction in Westport’s Move From Research & Development Mode to International Product Delivery
VANCOUVER, July 26, 2013 /CNW/ – Westport Innovations (TSX:WPT / NASDAQ:WPRT), engineering the world’s most advanced natural gas engines and vehicles, announced today that Nancy Gougarty has been appointed President and Chief Operating Officer of Westport after resigning her position on the company’s Board of Directors. The change in roles for Nancy is part of Westport’s progression from research and development into an organization focussed on the global commercialization of a wide range of products.
“Nancy brings valuable direction and experience in product delivery execution from her roles in the global automotive sector,” said David Demers, CEO of Westport. “Nancy will play a key role in implementing our strategic priorities, supporting Westport in meeting the challenges of operating a global business and driving Westport’s financial success with her experience in operations and international product sales.”
Nancy has extensive business experience in the global automotive industry. Originally appointed to the Westport Board of Directors in February 2013, she served as the vice president for TRW Automotive Corporation for Asia-Pacific, with responsibility for profit and loss, from January 2008 to 2012. TRW sales for Asia-Pacific were reported at $2.3 billion in 2011. Her previous positions included vice president of product planning, business planning and business development.
She has held high-profile leadership positions in the automotive sector, including Managing Director for General Motors’ joint venture in Shanghai, Director for Delphi Packard Asia Pacific, Global Account Director General Motors, and vice president for Delphi Automotive Systems, Japan and Korea.
About Westport
Westport engineers the world’s most advanced natural gas engines and vehicles. More than that, we are fundamentally changing the way the world travels the roads, rails and seas. We work with original equipment manufacturers (OEMs) worldwide from design through to production, creating products to meet the growing demand for vehicle technology that will reduce both emissions and fuel costs. To learn more about our business, visit westport.com, subscribe to our RSS feed, or follow us on Twitter @WestportDotCom.
Note: This document contains forward-looking statements about Westport’s business, operations, technology development or the environment in which it operates, which are based on Westport’s estimates, forecasts and projections. These statements are not guarantees of future performance and involve risks and uncertainties that are difficult to predict, or are beyond Westport’s control. Consequently, readers should not place any undue reliance on such forward-looking statements. In addition, these forward-looking statements relate to the date on which they are made. Westport disclaims any intention or obligation to update or revise any forward-looking statements, whether as a result of new information, future events or otherwise.
SOURCE Westport Innovations Inc.
/CONTACT: Investor Inquiries:
Darren Seed
Vice President, Investor Relations & Communications
Westport
Phone: 604-718-2046
Email: invest@westport.com Media Inquiries:
Nicole Adams
Director, Communications
Westport
Phone: 604-718-2011
Email: media@westport.com
Copyright CNW Group 2013








 



    Copyright © 2015 
    Chief Operating Officer Business Forum, Inc. 

        All rights reserved.








Nancy S Gougarty (Import & export history)
































 












Plans




Limited




Plus




Premium








            LimitedMonitor Your Competitors



Data

Access data on U.S. ocean freight imports from the last 3 months for all companies
You'll have access to data from the previous 6-months from the date of your search. We use a rolling date range, so you can always look back 6 months from the current date.




            LimitedMonitor Your Competitors



Data

Access data on U.S. ocean freight imports from the last 3 months for all companies
Access data on U.S. ocean freight imports from the last 3 months for all companies
You'll have access to data from the previous 3-months from the date of your search. We use a rolling date range, so you can always look back 3-months from the current date.




            PlusSmall & Medium Business



Data

Access data on U.S. ocean freight imports from the last 12 months for all companies
You'll have access to data from the previous 12-months from the date of your search. We use a rolling date range, so you can always look back 12-months from the current date.
U.S. ocean freight exports from January 1, 2014 to present for all companies




            Premium            Empire Builder



Data

Access data on U.S. ocean freight imports from November 2006 to the present for all companies
You'll have access to our entire database of shipping manifests of U.S. Ocean freight imports going back to November 2006.
U.S. ocean freight exports from January 1, 2014 to present for all companies





            LimitedMonitor Your Competitors



Usage

Track the shipping activities of your 3 chosen companies
Our Limited Plan lets you monitor the shipping activities of any three companies across all our databases. Be the first to know when your target company clears a shipment through customs in one of the countries we track.
3 Contact Info Requests Per Month
Our team of account managers and research assistants will help you find contact information for up to 3 companies in our database each month.
Download (CSV and XLS) 5k Records Per Month
If you're planning to do more in-depth research on the companies in our database, you should upgrade to the Plus or Premium plans, which allow more downloads.
Email Alerts for up to 3 Searches
If you need to track more than 3 companies, product segments, or trade lanes, you should upgrade to the Plus or Premium plan, which allow more email alerts.




            LimitedMonitor Your Competitors



Usage

10 Company Searches Per Day
10 searches per day may be enough if you are just monitoring a few competitors or researching suppliers in a single industry. If you're looking to connect with sales leads or do more in-depth research, you should upgrade to the Plus or Premium plan which allows more searches.
3 Contact Info Requests Per Month
Our team of account managers and research assistants will help you find contact information for up to 3 companies in our database each month.
Download (CSV and XLS) 1k Records Per Month
If you're planning to do more in-depth research on the companies in our database, you should upgrade to the Plus or Premium plan, which allow more downloads.
Email Alerts for up to 3 Company Searches
If you need to track more than 3 companies, product segments, or trade lanes, you should upgrade to the Plus or Premium plan, which allow more email alerts.




            Plus            Small & Medium Business



Usage

25 Searches Per Day
25 searches per day may be enough if you are just monitoring a few competitors or researching suppliers in a single industry. If you're looking to connect with sales leads or do more in-depth research, you should upgrade to the Premium plan which allows more searches.
25 Contact Info Requests Per Month
Our team of account managers and research assistants will help you find contact information for up to 25 companies in our database each month.
Download (CSV and XLS) 10k Records Per Month
If you're planning to do more in-depth research on the companies in our database, you should upgrade to the Premium plan, which allow more downloads.
Email Alerts for up to 5 Searches
If you need to track more than 5 companies, product segments, or trade lanes, you should upgrade to the Premium plan, which allow more email alerts.




            Premium            Empire Builder



Usage

50 Searches Per Day
 
50 Contact Info Requests Per Month
Our team of account managers and research assistants will help you find contact information for up to 50 companies in our database each month
Download (CSV and XLS) 25k Records Per Month
If you're planning to do more in-depth research on the companies in our database, contact the Sales Department to purchase more credits and export additional shipping records.
Email Alerts for up to 10 Searches





             Plus             Small & Medium Business



Features

Visual Mapping
Our Visual Mapping technology provides an instant snapshot of any company's trade connections. Navigate the global web of trading partners with the click of a mouse and visualize the relationships between companies many degrees apart.







            Premium            Empire Builder



Features

Visual Mapping
Our Visual Mapping technology provides an instant snapshot of any company's trade connections. Navigate the global web of trading partners with the click of a mouse and visualize the relationships between companies many degrees apart.







            Limited            Monitor Your Competitors



Support

Our Customer Service Agents are available when you need them. Call in to receive helpful tips and training.
Call or e-mail our Customer Service Agents. They will get back to as soon as possible to assist you with your data needs.




            Plus            Small & Medium Business



Support

Our Customer Service Agents are available when you need them. Call in to receive helpful tips and training.
Call or e-mail our Customer Service Agents. They will get back to as soon as possible to assist you with your data needs.




            Premium            Empire Builder



Support

Our Customer Service Agents are available when you need them. Call in to receive helpful tips and training.
Call or e-mail our Customer Service Agents. They will get back to as soon as possible to assist you with your data needs.
Dedicated Research Assistant
An experienced trade data specialist will serve as your dedicated account manager to locate hard-to-reach data, perform searches and compile reports on your behalf.




            Limited            Monitor Your Competitors



Data

Access data on U.S. ocean freight imports from the last 3 months for all companies
You'll have access to data from the previous 6-months from the date of your search. We use a rolling date range, so you can always look back 6 months from the current date.







X












                   Home                





                        How It Works                    



                            U.S. Data                        

                            Additional Countries                        

                            Our Datasets                        

                            Our Clients                        

                            IG Reviews                        

                            Videos                        

                            Pictures                        

                            Presentation                        



                   Plans & Pricing                

                    Search                

                  Contact Us                
Live Chat				

                    Free Demo                

                    Sign In                

                    Join Now                











English
中文
French










English



中文



French



 

Get global shipment alerts for Nancy S Gougarty, $9.95 /month

Processing, please wait ...







Cardholder's Name


Tell us your Full Name



Credit Card No. 








Enter a valid Card No.



Exp. Date

1 January
2 February
3 March
4 April
5 May
6 June
7 July
8 August
9 September
10 October
11 November
12 December




2017
2018
2019
2020
2021
2022
2023
2024
2025
2026



Postal Code / Zip


(or Postal Code if not in the USA)




  Terms of Service




Submit















			                                                Service: 855-573-9976 
                        Sales: +1-855-573-9976

 Live Chat

Choose Language
 English
 中文
 French




 



Hi, may I help you with something?

An ImportGenius.com sales agent is available to answer your question.


							Chat Live Now						

						No, thanks.					







Sign Up






Home
How It Works
Plans & Pricing
Search
Contact Us


Live Chat

2
  



 



Nancy S Gougarty

Nancy S Gougarty imports from Shanghai Tianci Xinda Int'l Trade in China through the port of Tacoma, Washington        





 Call +1 (480) 744 2559




Import Genius






                                Our bill of lading data reveals the trading activities of Nancy S Gougarty and millions of other importers.                            


Learn More
Join Now




Request a Demo





Would you like to schedule a free demo?
We'd love to show you international trade data relevant to your own business.










Name




Email





Phone






Schedule A Free Demo


















Play muted


International Trade Starts With Our Data









Other companies in our database

 TOSHIBA ELECTROMEX.S.A. DE C.V.    
 SAMSUNG ELECTRONICS AMERICA INCORPO
 FAMILY DOLLAR STORES,INC.
 GENERAL ELECTRIC CAPITAL CORPORATIO
 TOYS R-US (WAREHOUSE #0083)
















View Sample Shipment Records
Shipment Alert Subscription
Contact This Company



Sign Up

 





Sample shipment record for Nancy S Gougarty
Nancy S Gougarty imports from Shanghai Tianci Xinda Int'l Trade in China through the port of Tacoma, Washington


                                Bill of Lading                            





Manufacturer / Shipper
Consignee



SHANGHAI TIANCI XINDA INT'L TRADE
CO.,LTD RM 2106 NO.309 TANG GU RD SHANGHAI


NANCY S GOUGARTY
5902-1128 W.GEORGE ST. VANCOUVER BC L4K 3P2 CA



Notify Party
Marks and Numbers



NANCY S GOUGARTY
5902-1128 W.GEORGE ST. VANCOUVER BC L4K 3P2 CA



N/M
N/M





Master Bill of Lading Number
Container Number



EGLV142401816500


EMCU5310114
EMCU5310114


Product Description




OFFICE CABINET

OFFICE CABINET










Bill of LadingSVDFJF1410060VANArrival Date2014-11-01Weight (LB)497Weight (KG)226Quantity2 PKGContainer Count1Voyage No.099EPort of LoadingSHANGHAIPort of DischargeTACOMA, WASHINGTONVessel NameEVER UTILECarrier CodeSVDFCountry Of OriginChinaPlace Of ReceiptSHANGHAI 





Subscribe to access the complete shipping history for Nancy S Gougarty. Join Now 







How will your business use our trade data?
If you're involved in international trade, our database of shipping manifests will help you find opportunities to grow your business.

Find Trading Partners You Can Trust
Monitor Competitors' Shipping Activities
Connect With Sales Prospects














                            "Very informative and great site and so quick. Pretty slick."
                        







Betty Fatzie

                                                                    President,                                 
                                                                    Lab Products, Inc.                                
                            






                            "The service was great, with a reasonable price and great results. We have now started using another supplier from China. We just ordered our first container from the new supplier and with the savings it more than paid for the ImportGenius.com service on the first container load."
                        







Cleve Kurz

                                
                                                                    Gifford Monument Works                                
                            






                            "Import Genius is not merely an investment for our organization, it’s a vital instrument to effectively manage our time. It has afforded us the ability to quickly segment, target and position ourselves in front of prospective clients. Thank you, Import Genius!"
                        







David Bryant

                                                                    Director of Business Development,                                 
                                                                    John S. James Co.                                
                            






                            "Import Genius data is fantastic for evaluating component manufacturers in China."
                        







Sanjay Dastoor

                                
                                                                    BoostedBoards.com                                
                            






                            "We have confidence that we're working with the best manufacturers in part because Import Genius showed us that they already supply some of the world's top brands"
                        







Yaniv Masjedi

                                                                    Vice President,                                 
                                                                    Nextiva.com                                
                            






                            "Import Genius is a highly informative tool for monitoring public companies' operating activities. It is an invaluable part of our research."
                        







Eric DeLamarter

                                                                    Managing Partner,                                 
                                                                    Half Moon Capital                                
                            






                            "We find new clients for our customs brokerage in the ImportGenius database almost every day"
                        







Jayson Gispan

                                                                    Customs Brokerage Operations Manager,                                 
                                                                    Flexport.com                                
                            






                            "ImportGenius is a great research tool. We use it to evaluate manufacturers to make sure we are working with only the highest quality, most reliable suppliers"
                        







Chris Friedland

                                                                    Founder / CEO,                                 
                                                                    Build.com                                
                            






                            "ImportGenius gave us visibility into the actual shipping histories of the manufacturers we were evaluating and helped us feel comfortable we were working with the best suppliers in China."
                        







Morena Simitic

                                                                    COO,                                 
                                                                    BellaBeat.com                                
                            
























Shipment Alert Subscription



                        Get e-mail alerts when Nancy S Gougarty has new shipments.                        

Processing, please wait ...









Submit












Contact Nancy S Gougarty







 



Name



Business



Email



Phone




Submit




Processing, please wait ...

 

 





Features



Save and Share Reports
Easily get your searches out of Import Genius and into your team’s hands for further analysis. Export your findings to XLS or CSV, or send reports via email. It’s the simple things that make our trade data even more valuable to you.



See the Supply Chain
Visual Mapping shows you exactly how your target companies and their trading partners connect. Search by shipper and see everyone they’ve shipped to. Or search by consignee and see all their suppliers. Zoom in on any company to see their own trading network. Dive deep into international trade and discover the links in anyone’s supply chain.



Get Real-time Shipment Alerts
Stay on top of your competitors, suppliers, and customers with real-time alerts. Just set up a search and get an email whenever a new shipment matches your terms. Import Genius lets you know the moment they bring in a rival product or start shipping to a new partner.








Nancy S Gougarty
You've viewed 20 profile pages on Import Genius, which is the most we allow for free. Sign up for ImportGenius to get more details on over 3 million importers and exporters. It only takes seconds.






Sign Up for Import Genius! 








Plans




Limited
Monitor Your Competitors




Recommended Plan
Plus
Small & Medium Business




Premium
Empire Builder






Price





$
99
594
/month
for 6 months



                        Sign Up                    






$
199
1,194
/month
for 6 months



                        Sign Up                    






$
399
2,394
/month
for 6 months



                        Sign Up                    







Data




Access data on U.S. ocean freight imports from the last 3 months for all companies
View Details




Access data on U.S. ocean freight imports from the last 12 months for all companies
U.S. ocean freight exports from January 1, 2014 to present for all companies
View Details




Access data on U.S. ocean freight imports from November 2006 to the present for all companies
U.S. ocean freight exports from January 1, 2014 to present for all companies
View Details






Usage





Track the shipping activities of your 3 chosen companies
3 Contact Info Requests Per Month
Download (CSV and XLS) 5k Records Per Month
Email Alerts for up to 3 Searches

View Details





25 Searches Per Day
25 Contact Info Requests Per Month
Download (CSV and XLS) 10k Records Per Month
Email Alerts for up to 5 Searches

View Details





50 Searches Per Day
50 Contact Info Requests Per Month
Download (CSV and XLS) 25k Records Per Month
Email Alerts for up to 10 Searches

View Details






Features


 


Visual Mapping
View Details




Visual Mapping
View Details






Support




Our Customer Service Agents are available when you need them. Call in to receive helpful tips and training.
View Details




Our Customer Service Agents are available when you need them. Call in to receive helpful tips and training.
View Details





Our Customer Service Agents are available when you need them. Call in to receive helpful tips and training.
Dedicated Research Assistant

View Details






  






View All U.S. Imports
Instantly search 109,970,574 ocean freight records to monitor U.S. importers, research suppliers, generate sales leads and more.


As Featured In





















What is Import Genius





Who Uses Import Genius





Available Data Fields







What is Import Genius


												Import Genius reveals the trading activities of importers and exporters around the world.								

												We give you hard data about your overseas suppliers and domestic competitors. Using shipping databases from Customs agencies in the United States, Latin America, and India, Import Genius can help you find reliable new trading partners, monitor your competitors’ shipments, and keep an eye on your current suppliers and customers.								

												Our team of seasoned import-export veterans, cutting-edge software developers, and customer service professionals has worked for years to build the world's most powerful and accessible database of international trade intelligence.								



												We do this for a diverse client base that requires keen insight into international trade.								

												Our customers include some of the world's top importers, exporters, freight forwarders, logistics companies, manufacturers, investment banks, financial analysts, intellectual property attorneys, and more. They use our tools to:								

Research the trade activity of importers and suppliers
Identify and vet new sources for any kind of product
Monitor the competition and their trade connections
Generate sales leads for transportation and logistics companies
Track the activity of publicly-traded companies
Investigate and enforce intellectual property infringement
Ensure exclusive agent compliance




Who Uses Import Genius

Sourcing Professionals...

			Use our service to view shipping histories for suppliers.		

			We provide access to detailed customs records, letting you verify suppliers' true shipping volumes and U.S. customer lists. You can also look up your competing import firms to find where they buy their goods.		
+ Learn More
Competitive Intelligence Analysts...

			Use our service to learn where rivals source products.		

			We give clear insights into the importing volumes, new product releases, and broader competitive dynamics of your industry.		
+ Learn More


Sales & Marketing Teams...

			Use our service to generate sales prospects.		

			We give you the tools to target importers based on product type, location, shipping volumes, and more.		
+ Learn More
Financial Analysts...

			Use our service to monitor public companies' imports.		

			We offer rare data on the success or failure of new product launches, shipping trends and other operating data for companies in any industry.		
+ Learn More



Available Data Fields

Import Genius Data Fields

												By collecting the ocean freight bill of lading for all U.S. imports in our database, Import Genius provides unprecedented access to near real-time information on virtually every industry and company importing goods into the country.								

												For each shipment entering the U.S. by ocean, we provide access to the following information.								
Additional Fields Available for Some Shipments:

Phone Number
Fax Number
Email
Contact Person



List of Data Fields



ConsigneeThe company importing the shipment into the U.S.Consignee AddressThe address of the company importing the shipment into the U.S.ShipperThe overseas company exporting the shipment to the U.S.Shipper AddressThe address of the overseas company exporting the shipment to the U.S.Product DescriptionThe exporter's description of the shipment as it appears on the bill of lading or shipping manifestGross WeightThe gross weight of the shipment, excluding the weight of the actual container. This can appear in either pounds or kilograms at the discretion of the exporterNumber Of UnitsThe quantity of boxes customs would find if they were to open the shipment for inspection.VolumeThe volume of the shipment, generally defined in cubic meters or container base measurements (CBM)Arrival DateThe date the shipment arrives within the customs territory of the U.S.Foreign PortThe last port the shipment passes through before arriving in the U.S.Country Of OriginThe country of the last foreign port the shipment passes through before arriving in the U.S.U.S. PortThe U.S. port where the shipment enters the customs territory of the U.S.Carrier CodeThe four digit Standard Carrier Alpha Code of the ocean carrier or freight forwarder managing the transit of the shipmentVoyage NumberA unique code assigned to that particular sailing of the ship between two portsVessel NameThe name of the ship transporting the shipmentShip Registered InThe country where the ship is officially registeredBill Of Lading NumberThe unique number assigned to this particular shipment by the ocean carrier or freight forwarderContainer NumberThe unique number assigned to the ocean shipping container carrying the shipment in questionMarks & NumbersAny text or numbers appearing on the cartons 

















Import Genius

How It Works
Plans & Pricing
Our Trade Data Blog
Search
Latin Trade Data

Import Genius Reviews & Press Coverage
Who Uses Import Genius
Contact Us



Latest Posts




                                    Trump Properties Have…                                




                                    India, US palm oil imports…                                




                                    Chilean salmon exports…                                




                                    Limited Plan Now Available                                




                                    Solar panels: imports…                                




Company Profiles



                                    Reynaers Aluminim Sau                                



                                    Dongguan Source Direct Import & Exp                                



                                    Franks International Brasil Ltda                                



                                    Xiamen Ezra Healthy Science&technol                                



                                    High Susan Jane C/o Allied Int.                                











                     
                                            109,970,574  Records in our database and counting





Customer Support Team: 

                    Tel:  855-573-9976
                    International: +1 480-745-3396
                    Fax: +1 602-428-9400
info@importgenius.com

                    8901 E Pima Center Pkwy, 
		    Suite 105 
                    Scottsdale, AZ 85258


Shanghai, China:

                    Tel: +86-21-63806036


                    Mobile No.: +86-13671737628
                    Fax Number: +86-21-63806036


Shenzhen, China
                    
                            Tel: +86-755-89517585
                            Mob: +86-13925258002
                            Fax: +86-755-89517585                



Have questions? We'll reply quickly!





									         		Type your info below								         		











Message



Submit

Processing, please wait ...

 

 

                Trainings, Demos, and General Contact All Available            
Or Call Us:
Service:

                    +1-855-573-9976                
Sales:

                    +1-855-573-9976                
Back to top

 





All Rights Reserved. Copyright © 2017. Trade Data Services, Inc. 0.2290
 






 

 




We're Offline
Please leave us a message



To chat with a representative of Import Genius, your browser needs to be Internet Explorer 9 or higher. Please fill out the form below and a representative will contact you as soon as possible.



Name



Email



Phone



Message



Send




X

















Nancy Gougarty: ‘I’m a person who likes to get things done’ - The Globe and Mail























































































Jump to main navigationJump to main content




News Search
News









Login


Register





18 
Toronto





Subscribe
Help



AdChoices







Home»
Report on Business»
Globe Careers»
Management




















(Globe and Mail Update)










THE LADDER


Nancy Gougarty: ‘I’m a person who likes to get things done’
Add to ...




Brenda Bouw






Special to The Globe and Mail


Published
Sunday, Jul. 02, 2017 6:00AM EDT

Last updated
Sunday, Jul. 02, 2017 6:00AM EDT














 Comments



Share via email




Share on facebook




Share on twitter




Share on LinkedIn






 Print











Nancy Gougarty, 61, is CEO of Vancouver-based Westport Fuel Systems, which makes alternative-fuel systems and components such as natural gas engines. Before Westport, Ms. Gougarty was vice-president of TRW Automotive Corp.’s Asia-Pacific operations. She started her career as an industrial engineer at the Packard Electric Division of General Motors. She has a bachelor of science in industrial management from the University of Cincinnati.

I was born in Berkeley, Calif., but Ohio is where I was mostly based growing up. I have three older brothers and one younger sister. My father, a nuclear physicist, was a university professor and a researcher. We moved a lot. He would work nine months in his teaching assignment and took on research opportunities during the summers and took sabbaticals, which allowed us to live in interesting places around the world.One of his assignments was to the University of Saskatchewan. We lived in Saskatoon for 14 months. I was in the seventh and eighth grades. That was my first real winter. I don’t think I’ve been through another one like that since. We also lived in Australia when my father spent some time at the University of Melbourne. Needless to say, I changed schools quite a bit.Moving around a lot as a kid showed me the world is 360 degrees. You also get to know who you are. It’s almost like starting over each time. You get to tell people what they know about you. They have no history. It made me realize that behaviour and power of speech matter and need to be managed.I didn’t really know what I wanted to do for a career when I was growing up. My parents didn’t pressure us to figure it out. They had the attitude that we would find our way in life. They didn’t want us to work during high school and university. They felt that was our time to be free. My first full-time job was after graduation. That’s when I started my career with General Motors in Warren, Ohio.I called them Generous Motors. I worked there for 29 years in a few different divisions – everything from engineering and sales to recruiting and finance. I was also able to obtain my executive MBA while working there, and while mothering three children.Having the opportunity to live in lots of different places as a kid made me more willing to do that in my career. I spent nearly 15 years of my career in Asia, most of which was in China. Shanghai remains a special place for our family.As a leader, I like to go and see people in person. I can’t manage remotely. I can’t make decisions based only on e-mail or phone calls. People can have very polished e-mails. Also, in my experience, you can’t liken someone’s speaking skills to their capability. I spend more than 80 per cent of my time outside of headquarters. When you’re in the room, you can read body language. You can see comfort or discomfort. You can see happiness or sadness. There are also different nuances in different countries. Doing business in China has a very different nuance versus India versus Italy.My husband enabled my career success to date. He never held me back saying, “We have three kids, you can’t do that.” Instead, he would say, “If that’s what you want, go for it.” The two of us always tried to figure out together what was best. I never felt constrained; I wanted to be a wife, a mother. I wanted everything and he enabled a good bit of that.I’m a person who likes to get things done. I don’t really have limits on the kinds of things I’m willing to do. I can type my own presentations. I’m pretty self-sufficient. I describe myself as a roadblock remover. I think, as a leader, my job is to get those speed bumps as low as possible or remove whatever is blocking the road.I see my job as making sure I understand the whole voice of the organization. You can get very insulated at the top.I have a good memory. People say, “Don’t tell her anything you don’t want her to remember.”Some people might say I move too fast without enough facts. My opinion is that a bad decision is better than a perfect decision, as long as it keeps up momentum. I’m not sure with the kind of speed, in the [business] environment we’re in today, that we have the luxury of waiting for the perfect decision.I make mistakes, and I readily admit it. I sense that we have to move quickly and swift and when it’s not right, we’ll fix it. People also need to be able to tell me it’s not right. That means having an environment where people can tell me, “That wasn’t your best decision.”I’m very happy with where I am today. I’d like to continue to make Westport Fuels Systems even more successful. I also want to learn to laugh more and enjoy life more.As told to Brenda Bouw. This interview has been edited and condensed.


Report Typo/Error

Follow Brenda Bouw on Twitter: @BrendaBouw



Also on The Globe and Mail


Video: Talking Management: How Jobs, Gates used a disruptive technology to build different companies (The Globe and Mail)




 



More Related to this Story




THE LADDER
Evelyn Ernst: ‘We’re better known in Europe than Ontario’






THE LADDER
Nicholas Reichenbach: ‘Don’t ever underestimate the power of positive thought’






THE LADDER
Grant Sparling: ‘We dream out loud, we plan, we get to work and we have fun’






The Ladder
Graham Buksa: ‘I simply wanted to build things’






The Ladder
Jim Estill: Fail often, fail fast, fail cheap















Next story| Learn More

Discover content from The Globe and Mail that you might otherwise not have come across. Here we’ll provide you with fresh suggestions where we will continue to make even better ones as we get to know you better.







{{article_sprite}}

{{title}}
{{published_at}}


























Trending







{{title}}












Most popular videos »











 News


A breakdown of the moment John McCain voted against repealing Obamacare








 Report on Business


Inside the Market: The worst investment mistake you can make and how to avoid it








 News


Contraband cellphone video shows inmates' prison break








 Sports


Michael Phelps races a CGI shark over 100 metres










 Arts


Mechanical dragon roams Ottawa streets








 News


Watch McCain give a thumbs down on Obamacare repeal








 News


Businesses, residents set for Toronto Islands reopening








 News


Trudeau ‘glad’ U.S. dropped proposed border tax










 News


Confusion and disappointment: How Russians view Trump








 News


Terminally ill baby Charlie Gard has died








 Technology


Meet Perdix, the drones that can swarm like insects








 News


Protesters vow to 'take over Venezuela' ahead of Sunday vote







◀
●
●
●
▶








More from The Globe and Mail








 Report on Business



With takeovers off the table, Canada’s big telecoms must rely on homegrown strategy











 Life


Charismatic guru Michael Stone popularized ancient ideas




















Most popular







Trump names John Kelly as White House chief of staff, replacing Reince Priebus








Ottawa calls for investigation into Saudi Arabia’s apparent use of Canadian-made armoured vehicles against citizens








BC Liberal Leader Christy Clark resigns following defeat to NDP








How a Microsoft font brought down Pakistani Prime Minister Nawaz Sharif








Canada’s economy posts ‘blow out’ growth; dollar jumps




















Add to Watchlist




Add to Watchlist
















We've run into a glitch. Please try again later.






We've run into a glitch. Please try again later.

































